MARINE MAMMAL C OMMISSION Annual Report to Congress 2000 Marine Mammal Commission 4340 East-West Highway, Room 905 Bethesda, Maryland 20814 31 March 2001 Contents List of Tables ............................................................... iii List of Figures ............................................................... iv I. Introduction ...........................................................
1 Personnel ........................................................
1 Funding .........................................................
2 Reauthorization of the Marine Mammal Protection Act .......................
6 April 200 0 Hearings ..............................................
Development of a Co-Management Proposal ............................
Proposed Amendments .............................................
3 3 5 6 II.
III.
Species of Special Concern ..............................................
11 North Atlantic Right Whale .........................................
11 North Pacific Right Whale ..........................................
26 Gray Whale .....................................................
27 Gulf of Maine Harbor Porpoise ......................................
33 Bottlenose Dolphin ...............................................
41 Cook Inlet Beluga Whale ...........................................
45 Hawaiian Monk Seal ..............................................
54 Steller Sea Lion ..................................................
70 Pacific Walrus ...................................................
81 Harbor Seals in Alaska .............................................
87 Polar Bear .......................................................
91 Sea Otter ........................................................
98 Florida Manatee .................................................
104 Marine Mammal/Fisheries Interactions ..................................
Implementation of the Incidental-Take Regime for Commercial Fisheries ....................................
The Incidental-Take Regime .......................................
The Tuna-Dolphin Issue ...........................................
Pinniped-Fisheries Interactions .....................................
International Aspects of Marine Mammal Protection and Conservation .........................................................
The Compendium of Treaties and International Agreements ..............
International Whaling Commission ..................................
The Arctic Council ...............................................
Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora .................................... i IV. 119 119 123 129 140 147 147 148 155 160 V. VI. Marine Mammal Mortality Events ......................................
Unusual Mortality Events in 2000 ...................................
Working Group on Marine Mammal Unusual Mortality Events ............
Marine Mammal Rescue Assistance Act of 2000 .......................
Effects of Pollution on Marine Mammals .................................
Effects of Noise .................................................
Effects of Marine Debris ..........................................
Effects of Chemical Contaminants ..................................
165 166 169 170 171 171 180 185 187 187 187 188 191 199 199 200 201 209 213 213 214 214 216 219 227 235 247 VII.
VIII.
Research and Studies Program ..........................................
Survey of Federally Funded Marine Mammal Research ..................
Workshop s and Plann ing Meetings ..................................
Commission-Sponsored Research and Study Projects ....................
Sea Ice Workshop ...............................................
IX. Permits and Authorizations to Take Marine Mammals ......................
Permit-Related Regulations ........................................
Permit Application Review ........................................
Small-Take Authorizations ........................................
Interactions with Marine Mammals in the Wild ........................
Marine Mammals in Captivity ..........................................
Care and Maintenance Standards ....................................
Swim-with-the-Dolphin Regulations .................................
Exports of Marine Mammals to Foreign Facilities ......................
Release of Captive Marine Mammals to the Wild .......................
X. Appendix A: Marine Mammal Commission Recommendations in 2000 ..............
Appendix B: Reports of Commission-Sponsored Activities Available from the National Technical Information Service .........................
Appendix C: Selected Literature Published Elsewher e Resultin g from Commission-Sponsored Activities .................................
Appendix D: Statement of the Marine Mammal Commission on Reauthorization of the Marine Mammal Protection Act, 6 April 2000 .................. ii List of Tables Table 1.
Marine mammals listed as endangered or threatened under the Endangered Species Act and depleted under the Marine Mammal Protection Act, as of 31 December 2000 ..............................................
12 Estimates of harbor porpoise bycatch in sink gillnet fisheries in the Bay of Fundy (Canada), New England (U.S.), and off the U.S. mid-Atlantic states, 1990 1999 ........................................................
34 Counts of adult and juvenile (nonpup) Steller sea lions at U.S. rookery and haul-out trend sites by region, 1975 2000 ............................
73 Steller sea lion recovery actions taken by the National Marine Fisheries Service, 1990 1998 ....
.............................................
74 Estimates of Steller sea lions harvested and struck and lost in the annual subsistence harvest by Alaska Natives, 1992 1998 .........................
75 Estimated catches of Pacific walruses in Alaska and total reported catch of walruses in Russia, 1992 1999 ........................................
84 Numbers of polar bears tagged during Alaska Native harvests, 1989 2000 ......
94 California sea otter population counts, 1984 2000 ........................
101 Known manatee mortality in the southeastern United States (excluding Puerto Rico) reported through the manatee salvage and necropsy program, 1978 2000 ...........
............................................
106 Estimated incidental kill of dolphins in the tuna purse seine fishery in the eastern tropical Pacific Ocean, 1972 2000 .........................
130 Annual number of reported strandings of California sea lions along the California Coast, including those with gunshot wounds, 1995 1999 ..........
144 IWC quotas and number of bowhead whales taken by Alaska Natives, 1973 2000 ...........
............................................
151 The number and percentage of marine species worldwide with records of marine debris entanglement and ingestion by species group ...............
181 Rec omm end ed ac tio ns i den tif ied in t he D ecl arat ion of R eso lve by participants in the August 2000 International Marine Debris Conference .......
184 Table 2.
Table 3.
Table 4.
Table 5.
Table 6.
Table 7.
Table 8.
Table 9.
Table 10.
Table 11.
Table 12.
Table 13.
Table 14.
iii List of Figures Figure 1.
Figure 2.
Figure 3.
Figure 4.
Figure 5.
Figure 6.
Figure 7.
Figure 8.
Figure 9.
Designated critical habitats and mandatory ship reporting zones for North Atlantic right whales.
...........................................
14 North Atlantic right whale found entangled in commercial fishing gear on 9 July 2000 in the Bay of Fundy and subsequently disentangled ............
16 Time-area management zones under the Gulf of Maine Harbor Porpoise Take Reduction Plan .................................................
38 The Hawaiian Archipelago ............................................
55 Combined annual mean beach counts for all major Hawaiian monk seal breeding colonies ...........................................................
56 Annual mean beach counts and pups born at French Frigate Shoals ............
56 Annual mean beach counts and pups born at Laysan Island ...................
58 Annual mean beach counts and pups born at Lisianski Island .................
59 Annual mean beach counts and pups born at Pearl and Hermes Reef ...........
59 Figure 10.
Annual mean beach counts and pups born at Midway Atoll ..................
60 Figure 11.
Annual mean beach counts and pups born at Kure Atoll .....................
61 Figure 12.
Number of Hawaiian monk seals found entangled annually, 1982 2000 ........
64 Figure 13.
Designated critical habitat for the western population of Steller sea lions.
.......
71 Figure 14.
Range of the Pacific walrus ...........................................
82 Figure 15.
Regional boundaries of Florida manatee subpopulation units ................
105 Figure 16.
Enforcement patrol at manatee speed zone in Crystal River, Florida ..........
109 Figure 17.
Power plant outfalls and natural springs used by Florida manatees as major warm-water refuges ...........................................
111 Figure 18.
Carcass of an adult male gray whale on Agate Beach, California .............
168 Figure 19.
Crew members from the Coast Guard Cutter Walnut recover part of the 57,000 lbs. of marine debris collected from the Northwestern Hawaiian Islands ...........................................................
182 Figure 20.
Map of the region on which the Sea Ice Workshop focused .................
192 iv Chapter I INTRODUCTION This is the 28th Annual Report of the Marine Mammal Commission, covering the period 1 January through 31 December 2000.
It is being submitted to Congress pursuant to section 204 of the Marine Mammal Protection Act of 1972.
Established under Title II of the Act, the Marine Mammal Commission is an independent agency of the Executive Branch.
It is charged with reviewing and making recommendations on domestic and international actions and policies of all federal agencies with respect to marine mammal protection and conservation and with carrying out a research program.
The purpose of this report is to provide timely information on management-related issues and events that have come under the purview of the Marine Mammal Commission during the year.
The report is provided to Congress, federal and state agencies, public interest groups, the academic community, private citizens, and the international community.
When combined with previous annual reports, it provides a record of the evolution and progress of U.S. policies and programs to conserve marine mammals and their habitats.
To ensure accuracy, drafts of the report were reviewed by involved federal and state agencies and knowledgeable individuals.
The Commission's staff includes Robert H. Mattlin, Ph.D., Executive Director; Timothy J. Ragen, Ph.D., Scientific Program Director; David W. Laist, Policy and Program Analyst; Michael L. Gosliner, General Counsel; Suzanne Montgomery, Special Assistant to the Executive Director; Jeannie K. Drevenak, Permit Officer; Nancy L. Shaw, Administrative Officer; and Darel E. Jordan, Staff Assistant.
During 2000 two of the Commission's long-time senior staff members retired from government service.
They were John R. Twiss, Jr., who served as executive director from the establishment of the Commission in 1974 until his retirement on 1 September 2000, and Robert J. Hofman, Ph.D., the Commission's scientific program director from 1975 until 30 June 2000.
The Commission Chairman, with the concurrence of other Commissioners, appoints persons to the ninemember Committee of Scientific Advisors on Marine Mammals.
The Marine Mammal Protection Act requires that committee members be scientists who are knowledgeable in marine ecology and marine mammal affairs.
At the end of 2000 the committee members were Lloyd F. Lowry (Chairman), Fairbanks, Alaska; Daryl J. Boness, Ph.D., Smithsonian Institution, Washington, DC; Frances M. D. Gulland, Vet. M.B., Ph.D., The Marine Mammal Center, Sausalito, California; Steven K. Katona, Ph.D., College of the Atlantic, Bar Harbor, Maine; Galen B. Rathbun, Ph.D., Cambria, California; Stephen B. Reilly, Ph.D., National Marine Fisheries Service, La Jolla, California; Barbara L. Taylor, Ph.D., National Marine Fisheries Service, La Jolla, California; Peter L. Tyack, Ph.D., Woods Hole Oceanographic Institution, Woods Hole, Massachusetts; and Douglas Wartzok, Ph.D., University of Missouri, St. Louis.
Mr. Caleb Pungowiyi, president of the Robert Aqqaluk Memorial Trust, Kotzebue, Alaska, serves as Special Advisor to the Marine Mammal Commission on Native Affairs.
Personnel The Commission consists of three members nominated by the President and confirmed by the Senate.
The Marine Mammal Protection Act requires that Commissioners be knowledgeable in marine ecology and resource management.
At the end of 2000 the Commissioners were John E. Reynolds, III, Ph.D. (Chairman), Eckerd College, St. Petersburg, Florida; Paul K. Dayton, Ph.D., Scripps Institution of Oceanography, La Jolla, California; and Vera Alexander, Ph.D., University of Alaska, Fairbanks.
1 MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 During 2000 Joseph R. Geraci, V.M.D., Ph.D., National Aquarium in Baltimore, Baltimore, Maryland; Bruce R. Mate, Ph.D., Oregon State University, Newport; and Jeanette A. Thomas, Ph.D., Western Illinois University, Moline, completed their terms of service on the Committee of Scientific Advisors.
Funding Appropriations to the Marine Mammal Commission in the past five fiscal years have been as follows: FY 1996, $1,190,000; FY 1997, $1,189,000; FY 1998, $1,185,000; FY 1999, $1,240,000; and FY 2000, $1,265,000.
The Commission's appropriation for the current fiscal year, FY 2001, is $1,696,260.
2 Chapter II REAUTHORIZATION OF THE MARINE MAMMAL PROTECTION ACT The Marine Mammal Protection Act was enacted in 1972.
Since then, it has been amended and reauthorized several times.
The most recent authorization, enacted in 1994, extended appropriation authority for carrying out the provisions of the Act through fiscal year 1999.
Although the Act has yet to be reauthorized since then, its provisions remain in effect and Congress continues to appropriate funding to carry out its mandates.
As a matter of course, Congress examines the implementation of the Act during the reauthorization process and it is not uncommon for amendments to be made at such intervals.
For example, major amendments were enacted in 1984, 1988, and 1994, the last three times the Act was reauthorized.
The Act may also be amended at other times, as it was in 1997 when changes were made to the Act's tunadolphin provisions (see Chapter IV).
Most recently, the Act was amended by enactment of the Marine Mammal Rescue Assistance Act of 2000, enacted as Title II of Public Law 106-555.
This Act created the John H. Prescott Marine Mammal Rescue Assistance Grant Program and directed the Secretary of Commerce to initiate a study of the environmental and biological factors that may be contributing to the increase in mortality events involving the eastern North Pacific stock of gray whales.
These amendments are discussed in Chapter VI of this report.
As expected, Congress began the process to reauthorize the Marine Mammal Protection Act during 1999.
As discussed in the previous annual report, the Subcommittee on Fisheries Conservation, Wildlife, and Oceans of the House Resources Committee held an initial hearing on 29 June 1999 at which the Commission and the other federal agencies with primary responsibilities under the Act testified on implementation of the 1994 amendments and identified problems that may warrant additional legislation.
The statement submitted 3 by the Commission provided a comprehensive review of the 1994 amendments and described the steps taken to implement the amendments and identified those provisions that had yet to be fully implemented.
The statement also identified particular areas where further amendments may be useful and on which Congress may want to focus its attention as it considers reauthorizing the Act.
A summary of the Commission's recommendations and the full text of the Commission's statement were included in the previous annual report.
No further hearings were held during 1999, and no reauthorization bill was introduced during the 1999 session of Congress.
6 April 2000 Hearings Two additional oversight hearings were held by the Subcommittee on Fisheries Conservation, Wildlife, and Oceans during 2000, both on 6 April.
The Chairman of the Commission testified at the first hearing, which examined implementation of section 118 of the Marine Mammal Protection Act, the new regime to govern the taking of marine mammals incidental to commercial fisheries enacted in 1994.
A summary of the Commission's statement is provided below.
The full text is provided in Appendix D of this report.
The Commission was not asked to testify at the second hearing, which examined actions taken under section 119 of the Act, a provision added in 1994 to authorize the Fish and Wildlife Service and the National Marine Fisheries Service to enter into cooperative agreements with Alaska Native organizations aimed at conserving marine mammals and co-managing subsistence uses.
Fisheries Hearing The first hearing on 6 April 2000 examined progress in implementing the new incidental take regime for fisheries and considered ways in which the MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 process might be improved.
Witnesses included the Chairman of the Commission, the Deputy Assistant Administrator for Fisheries of the National Marine Fisheries Service, and representatives of various groups that had participated on take reduction teams, representing the fishing industry, environmental organizations, and the scientific community.
The Commission's testimony summarized the applicable statutory requirements and the efforts of the five take reduction teams that have been established to address the most pressing fishery� marine mammal interaction problems.
The Commission concluded that the existing requirements for developing and implementing take reduction plans appeared to be appropriate and fundamentally sound, but noted that the Service has had difficulty meeting all section 118 requirements in a timely manner.
The Commission noted that these delays seemed to be undermining the confidence of take reduction team members in the process, may expose the Service to litigation risks, and, for some marine mammals, such as the northern right whale, may be significantly affecting the species' prospects for recovery.
With respect to the Atlantic Large Whale Take Reduction Plan, the Commission expressed the view that the only sure way to reduce entanglement risks for the critically endangered right whale is to prevent hazardous fishing gear from being deployed in areas where right whales are most likely to occur
The Commission therefore called on Congress to prod the Service into taking all necessary steps to implement fisheries closures designed to eliminate hazardous fishing gear from those areas designated as right whale critical habitat during times of the year when whales are most likely to be present.
The Commission further recommended that Congress encourage the Service to develop adaptive regulatory strategies that enable it to institute temporary restrictions in other fishing areas during periods when concentrations of right whales are detected.
The Commission also identified problems that had been encountered in implementing the Gulf of Maine Harbor Porpoise Take Reduction Plan.Because of constantly changing fishery closures being imposed at the recommendation of the New England Fishery Management Council, it had been difficult for the take reduction team to provide timely advice on regulatory measures needed to achieve marine mammal take 4 reduction goals.
In the Commission's view, there is a need to coordinate the different regulatory regimes to ensure that all measures necessary to achieve take reduction goals are reflected in and implemented through a comprehensive plan.
The Commission's testimony also reiterated a suggested statutory change that it had recommended at the 29 June 1999 hearing.
The Commission noted that section 118 currently requires that a take reduction plan be developed for each strategic stock of marine mammals regardless of whether there is a significant level of fishery-related mortality and serious injury.
Inasmuch as some stocks are considered strategic solely because they are listed as endangered or threatened under the Endangered Species Act or designated as depleted under the Marine Mammal Protection Act, not because of a high incidence of fishery interactions, the Commission recommended that a plan not be required for those strategic stocks for which mortality and serious injury resulting from fishing operations are inconsequential.
The Commission also called on Congress not to lose sight of other threats faced by marine mammals as those involved begin to find solutions to problems involving fishery-related takes.
In this regard, the Commission's testimony highlighted the threats to Florida manatees posed by boat collisions and, more generally, by habitat degradation.
It also identified the effects of ocean contaminants on marine mammals as a growing concern.
During the hearing, it was suggested that a process similar to that used for developing take reduction teams under section 118, which involves all affected constituencies, might be brought to bear on some of these problems.
The Commission's testimony concluded by noting that most research and conservation actions under the Marine Mammal Protection Act and other wildlife statutes are undertaken in response to acute, often controversial conservation issues.
However, there is also a need for more effective recovery strategies that anticipate and develop solutions to emerging problems before they reach a critical stage.
The Commission therefore recommended that Congress consider the need to build these alternatives into the Act as it takes up reauthorization.
Chapter II Reauthorization of the MMPA Hearing on Cooperative Agreements under Section 119 Witnesses at the second hearing included the Assistant Administrator for Fisheries of the National Marine Fisheries Service, the Alaska Regional Director of the Fish and Wildlife Service, and representatives of five Alaska Native organizations.
The Native organizations represented at the hearing were the Indigenous People's Council for Marine Mammals, the Alaska Nanuuq Commission, the Alaska Native Harbor Seal Commission, the Aleut Marine Mammal Commission, and the Alaska Sea Otter and Steller Sea Lion Commission.
The National Marine Fisheries Service's testimony discussed efforts that had been made to conclude cooperative agreements with Alaska Native organizations concerning beluga whales, harbor seals, Steller sea lions, and northern fur seals.
Despite these successes, the Service noted certain shortcomings with respect to the implementation of section 119.
For example, the process for negotiating cooperative management agreements is lengthy and, for some species, it may not be clear which Native group or groups should be party to an agreement.
With regard to this last point, the Service expressed its preference for entering into co-management agreements with tribally authorized organizations in light of administration policies concerning tribal sovereignty and because of enforcement considerations.
The Service expressed concern as to whether committees set up to help implement cooperative agreements are subject to the Federal Advisory Committee Act.
The Service also noted that its efforts under section 119 have been constrained to some extent by funding limitations.
The Fish and Wildlife Service described its efforts to develop and implement cooperative agreements for sea otters, polar bears, and Pacific walruses.
The key shortcoming concerning the existing statutory provision identified by the Service was the inability of the parties to conclude an agreement that includes enforceable provisions for managing subsistence harvests of marine mammals stocks before they become depleted.
Both Services and the representatives of the Native organizations indicated that they were working together to develop an amendment proposal to enable the parties to enter into true co-management agreements that would provide for joint regulation of taking for subsistence 5 purposes before depletion.
Members of the House Resources Committee, including the Committee chairman, encouraged the agencies and the Native groups to conclude work on such a proposal so that it could be considered during the 2000 congressional session.
Development of A Co-Management Proposal Spurred by the Committee's interest in the comanagement proposal, the agencies continued their discussions with Native groups.
These efforts culminated in a two-day negotiating session in Anchorage on 1516 May 2000.
A member of the Commission's staff, as well as representatives of the Fish and Wildlife Service and the National Marine Fisheries Service, participated in the discussions on behalf of the government.
Native interests were represented by the Indigenous People's Council for Marine Mammals.
Participants at the meeting believed that comanagement agreements should be addressed in a separate section of the Act and that the existing section 119 should remain intact to accommodate cooperative efforts other than full co-management.
They also worked out proposed language for the new provision that would provide for the National Marine Fisheries Service and the Fish and Wildlife Service to enter into co-management agreements with Alaska Native tribes or tribally authorized organizations to regulate subsistence use of marine mammals by Alaska Natives, notwithstanding the authority for such taking under section 101(b) of the Act.
Co-management agreements would include a management plan that (1) identifies the parties to the agreement and the stock or species and geographical area covered, (2) is based on biological information and traditional ecological knowledge, (3) provides for a sustainable harvest that is designed to prevent populations from becoming depleted, (4) has clearly defined enforcement and implementation processes, and (5) specifies the duration of the agreement and sets forth procedures for periodic review and termination.
Once such an agreement has been concluded, it would become unlawful for any person within the geographical area to which it applies to take, transport, sell, or possess a marine mammal in violation of any ordinance or MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 regulation adopted by the signatory tribe or organization.
As with cooperative agreements under section 119, co-management agreements under the new provision would authorize grants to the Native parties for purposes of developing and implementing the agreements.
Other provisions agreed to by the participants spelled out the effect of a depletion finding for a species subject to a co-management agreement, provided for public notice and review before concluding co-management agreements, provided separate funding authority to implement the new provisions, and placed limits on the ability of the State of Alaska to obtain management authority for species or stocks subject to co-management agreements.
The language agreed to at this meeting, with a few technical modifications, was reflected in proposed amendments transmitted to Congress by the Secretary of Commerce and the Secretary of the Interior.
Proposed Amendments After extensive interagency consultations and coordination, the Secretary of Commerce and the Secretary of the Interior on 16 August 2000 transmitted to Congress a draft reauthorization bill entitled the Marine Mammal Protection Act Amendments of 2000.
The bill would have authorized appropriations for the Marine Mammal Commission, the Department of Commerce, and the Department of the Interior to carry out their responsibilities under the Act through fiscal year 2005.
In addition, the bill recommended extensive revisions to the Act to address various problems that had arisen since the last reauthorization and to clarify certain provisions of the 1994 and 1997 amendments.
The full text of the proposed amendments, as well as the accompanying statement of purpose and need, can be found at the National Marine Fisheries Service's web page (http://www.nm fs. noaa.gov/prot_res/PR2/ MMPA_Reauthorization). agreements with Alaska Native organizations, the comanagement agreements entered into under the new provision would be enforceable by both parties.
Thus, any limitation on when, where, how, or how many marine mammals may be taken that was agreed to by the parties to the agreement would be binding on all members of the Native organization or organizations that are signatories to the agreement.
Currently, such limitations can be established only after the affected marine mammal stock has been determined to be depleted and, even then, only through formal rulemaking.
Co-management agree-ments would be limited to Alaska Native tribes or tribally recognized organizations as a means of ensuring that the Native party had sufficient authority to enforce the agreement with respect to its membership.
The proposed comanagement amend-ment would require the Service to provide draft regu-lations and consult with comanagement partners before imposing any restrictions on Native taking and to seek their advice before making a depletion finding concerning any species or stock covered by the agree-ment.
In addition, as noted above, the proposed amendment would provide for cooperative enforce-ment by the Services and Native organizations, would limit the ability of the State of Alaska to secure the transfer of management authority for marine mammal species covered by coman ag emen t ag reements, would provide an opportunity for public review and comment prior to approval of a co-management agreement, and would authorize specific funding to carry out the new provisions.
Cultural Exchanges and Exports As part of a package of permit-related amendments enacted in 1994, a provision was added to prohibit the export of marine mammals for purposes other than public display, scientific research, or enhancing the survival of a species or stock.
Although this prohibition is subject to exceptions set forth elsewhere in the Act, it was added late in the 1994 reauthorization process, and its drafters neglected to include any such exceptions.
Thus, certain types of exports that had been permissible before 1994 arguably could no longer be authorized.
The 1994 amendments also added section 101(a)(6) to the Act to allow marine mammal products 6 Co-Management The centerpiece of the proposed bill was the comanagement provision worked out between the agencies and representatives of the Alaska Native hunting community.
Unlike existing section 119, which also enables the National Marine Fisheries Service and the Fish and Wildlife Service to enter into cooperative Chapter II Reauthorization of the MMPA to be imported into the United States if they are (1) legally possessed and exported by a U.S. citizen in conjunction with foreign travel, (2) obtained by an Alaska Native outside the United States as part of a cultural exchange, or (3) owned by a Native inhabitant of Russia, Canada, or Greenland and are being imported for noncommercial purposes in conjunction with personal travel or as part of a cultural exchange with an Alaska Native.
However, the drafters of this provision did not anticipate enactment of the export prohibition.
Thus, many U.S. citizens may not be able to avail themselves of the import provision because they could not have legally exported the item in the first place.
Similarly, Natives from other countries who bring marine mammal items into the United States under this provision may face difficulties when they try to take those items with them when they depart.
To address these and related problems, the proposed bill would amend several sections of the Act to indicate when exports of marine mammals or marine mammal products are allowed.
Among other things, the proposed amendments would clarify that exports are permissible or may be authorized in the following instances: exports related to foreign travel or as part of a cultural exchange, exports of authentic Native handicrafts, and exports related to a waiver of the Act's moratorium on taking or importing marine mammals.
In addition, the proposed bill would clarify that permits may be issued to authorize the export of marine mammals for purposes of public display, scientific research, and species enhancement.
Although such exports are currently allowed, the existing provisions are geared toward transfers of marine mammals from U.S. facilities, which does not require a permit, rather than direct export of marine mammals taken from U.S. waters by foreign facilities.
The proposed amendments to section 104 would merely supplement the existing mechanisms for authorizing exports by adding another alternative; they would not require that a permit be obtained in those instances where a permit currently is not required.
The proposed bill would also amend the Act's prohibition section to revert to language enacted in 1981 but changed by the 1994 amendments.
The proposed change would close a potential loophole by clarifying that transporting, purchasing, selling, or exporting marine mammals or marine mammal parts is prohibited 7 unless otherwise authorized regardless of whether the underlying taking was in violation of the Act.
Permit-Related Amendments Three sections of the proposed bill would address specific problems that have arisen with respect to permits under the Act.
As discussed in the polar bear section of Chapter III, the 1994 amendments added a provision authorizing the issuance of permits for the importation of polar bear trophies from Canada.
Currently, the Fish and Wildlife Service is required to publish in the Federal Register a notice of the receipt of the application for each such permit and a notice of issuance for each permit.
Inasmuch as the only determinations to be made are whether the trophy to be imported was legally taken in Canada from an authorized management unit, and no public comment has ever been received, the proposed bill would streamline the permitting process by eliminating these publication requirements.
In their place, to ensure that the public continues to have access to information on these types of permits, the Service would be required to make available on a semiannual basis a summary of all such permits issued or denied.
As discussed in Chapter X, there has been some dispute as to whether releasing captive marine mammals to the wild constitutes a taking that requires authorization.
The Commission, the National Marine Fisheries Service, and others have taken the view that releasing marine mammals has the potential to injure the animals or wild populations exposed to the animals and, therefore, should be considered to be a taking.
This view was adopted in a 1999 enforcement proceeding brought by the Service against individuals who had released two long-term captive dolphins without obtaining authorization.
To codify this interpretation, the proposed bill would add an explicit prohibition on releasing captive marine mammals unless authorized by a permit or under section 109(h) of the Act, which authorizes the rehabilitation and release of stranded marine mammals.
Chapter X also notes that the 1994 amendments to the Marine Mammal Protection Act eliminated most of the authority of the National Marine Fisheries Service and the Fish and Wildlife Service over captive marine mammals.
One result of this shift in agency responsibilities was the invalidation of a long-standing MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 National Marine Fisheries Service policy against issuing permits for traveling displays of dolphins or other cetaceans.
This policy had been instituted because of the high stress levels and other risks posed by such exhibits on this group of animals.
The pro-posed bill would reinstate the ban on traveling cetacean exhibits through an amendment to the Act's prohibition section.
The proposed bill also recommended several technical changes to the Act's tuna-dolphin provisions to correct or clarify certain provisions of the 1997 International Dolphin Conservation Program Act.
Enforcement and Penalties The fines and other penalties that may be assessed under the Marine Mammal Protection Act have not been increased since the Act was originally enacted in 1972.
To account for inflation since that time and to enhance effective enforcement of the Act, the proposed bill would increase the maximum civil penalty from $10,000 to $50,000 for each violation.
Maximum criminal fines would be increased from $20,000 to $100,000 per violation.
Similarly, the maximum fine that could be assessed against a vessel for violating the Act would be increased from $25,000 to $50,000.
Another proposed amendment would allow for the seizure and forfeiture of a vessel's cargo (including fish) for fishing in violation of the provisions of section 118 of the Act.
The proposed amendments would also add a new provision explicitly prohibiting various actions that frustrate implementation and enforcement of the Act.
The recommended provision would make it illegal to refuse a lawful vessel boarding, interfere with an authorized search or inspection, or submit false information in an investigation.
Fisheries Provisions As discussed in Chapter IV, the 1994 amendments to the Marine Mammal Protection Act established a new regime to govern the taking of marine mammals incidental to commercial fishing operations.
This regime replaced an interim exemption for commercial fisheries that had been enacted in 1988.
The proposed bill would strike the interim exemption provisions (section 114 of the Act), which are no longer operative, and make certain modifications to the current provisions.
Most notably, the proposed amendments would expand the coverage of the incidental take regime to include not only commercial fisheries, but recreational fisheries as well.
This change was considered desirable because, in some areas, recreational fishermen use the same gear and fishing techniques as do commercial fishermen, yet are not subject to the requirements of section 118 pertaining to monitoring, reporting, and take reduction.
Other proposed amendments would (1) clarify that it is a violation of the Act to engage in a fishery that frequently or occasionally takes marine mammals (category I and II fisheries) without having registered, (2) clarify that owners of vessels engaged in category I and II fisheries are required to carry an observer when requested, whether or not they are registered, (3) consolidate all section 118 prohibitions into a single subparagraph to eliminate possible confusion, (4) eliminate the requirement to prepare a take reduction plan for a strategic stock if it is determined that fisheryrelated mortality and serious injury are having a negligible impact on that stock, and (5) require that California sea otters be factored into monitoring and observer placement decisions, even though takings of this species are not authorized.
The bill also proposed deleting subsection 120(j) of the Act, which contains provisions applicable to the Gulf of Maine stock of harbor porpoises that are no longer needed.
8 Marine Mammal Commission Administration The Marine Mammal Protection Act currently limits the amount that the Commission may compensate experts or consultants to $100 per day.
This limitation, in today's economy, prevents the Commission from securing the services of virtually all experts and consultants.
The proposed bill would eliminate this restriction and place the Commission on an equal footing with other government agencies.
Marine Mammal Health and Stranding Response Under the proposed bill, appropriations would be authorized to carry out Title IV of the Marine Mammal Protection Act through fiscal year 2005.
In addition, proposed amendments to section 402 (data collection), section 403 (stranding response agree- Chapter II Reauthorization of the MMPA ments), and section 406 (indemnification) would specify that these provisions apply to disentanglement activities as well as to stranding responses.
Research Grants Section 110 of the Marine Mammal Protection Act authorizes the National Marine Fisheries Service and the Fish and Wildlife Service to make grants or otherwise fund research pertaining to the protection and conservation of marine mammals and identifies specific research projects to be undertaken.
All of the projects under this provision, however, should now have been completed.
Therefore, the proposal submitted to Congress recommended that the provisions applicable to those projects be deleted.
In addition, it was proposed that section 110 be expanded to clarify that research be directed not only at specific marine mammal issues but at ecosystem-level problems as well.
In this regard the proposed language identified studies of two such problems that should be given high priority -- a Bering SeaChukchi Sea ecosystem study and a study of the California coastal marine ecosystem.
The proposed amendments also included an authorization for separate funding to be directed at research projects under section 110 but did not recommend specific funding levels.
Definition of Harassment Although harassment has been one element of the term "take" since the Marine Mammal Protection Act was enacted in 1972, a definition of harassment was not added to the Act until 1994.
Under that definition, Level A harassment is any act of pursuit, torment, or annoyance that has the potential to injure a marine mammal or marine mammal stock in the wild.
Level B harassment is defined as any act of pursuit, torment, or annoyance that has the potential to disturb a marine mammal or marine mammal stock in the wild by causing disruption of behavioral patterns, including, but not limited to, migration, breathing, nursing, breeding, feeding, or sheltering.
The definition has been subject to differing interpretations.
For example, as discussed in Chapter IX, the National Marine Fisheries Service, in the context of small-take authorizations, has recently adopted the position that, to constitute Level B harassment, any disturbance must significantly disrupt behavior patterns.
The Commission, in contrast, has noted that the statutory definition of harassment contains no such threshold, requiring only that an action have the potential to disrupt behavioral patterns.
Further in this regard, the Commission has noted that using a significance criterion would likely complicate enforcement of the Act, requiring that the Service, to sustain a case, show not only that a marine mammal has been disturbed but that any such disturbance has had biological significance (e.g., by adversely affecting the animal's survival or reproductive potential).
To eliminate the ambiguities in the current definition and to provide greater predictability, the proposed bill would redefine the term "harassment."
Level A harassment would be redefined as any act that injures or has the significant potential to injure a marine mammal or marine mammal stock in the wild.
Level B harassment would be split into two parts.
First, Level B harassment would be any act that disturbs or is likely to disturb a marine mammal or marine mammal stock in the wild by causing disruption of natural behavioral patterns, including, but not limited to, migration, surfacing, nursing, breeding, feeding, or sheltering to a point where such behavioral patterns are abandoned or significantly altered.
Second, Level B harassment would be any act directed toward a specific individual, group, or stock of marine mammals in the wild that is likely to disturb the mammal or mammals by disrupting behavior, including, but not limited to, migration, surfacing, nursing, breeding, feeding, or sheltering.
9 Chapter III SPECIES OF SPECIAL CONCERN Section 202 of the Marine Mammal Protection Act directs the Marine Mammal Commission, in consultation with its Committee of Scientific Advisors, to make recommendations to the Department of Commerce, the Department of the Interior, and other agencies on actions needed to conserve marine mammals.
To meet this charge, the Commission devotes special attention to particular species and populations that are vulnerable to various types of human impacts.
Such species may include marine mammals listed as endangered or threatened under the Endangered Species Act or depleted under the Marine Mammal Protection Act (Table 1), as well as other species or populations facing special conservation challenges.
During 2000 special attention was directed to a number of endangered, threatened, or depleted species or populations.
As discussed below, these include North Atlantic right whales, the western North Pacific stock of gray whales, mid-Atlantic coastal bottlenose dolphins, Cook Inlet beluga whales, Hawaiian monk seals, Steller sea lions, southern sea otters, and Florida manatees.
Other species not so listed, but which received special attention, include eastern North Pacific gray whales, Gulf of Maine harbor porpoises, bottlenose dolphins (other than the mid-Atlantic coastal bottlenose dolphins), Pacific walruses, polar bears, and sea otters in Alaska.
the eastern North Atlantic and the Gulf of St. Lawrence in the western North Atlantic).
Despite an international ban on hunting right whales adopted in 1935, they continued to be killed into the 1950s by nations slow to adopt the measure, by illegal whaling, and for scientific research under an international provision allowing nations to unilaterally authorize their citizens to take any whale species for that purpose.
Since the 1950s intentional taking of the species appears to have stopped; however, the remaining population is now so small that even occasional humancaused deaths from ship strikes and incidental entanglement in fishing gear are a major obstacle to recovery.
With the total number of North Atlantic right whales perhaps numbering about 300 whales, the only large whale species more endangered is the North Pacific right whale (E. japonica), whose abundance is uncertain but generally thought to be less.
At this level of abundance, which is less than half the size of remaining populations of pandas and some tigers, North Atlantic right whales also are one of the world's most endangered mammals.
The only remaining population of North Atlantic right whales occurs in the western North Atlantic Ocean off the U.S. and Canadian coasts.
Through intensive studies at five seasonal high-use habitats, scientists from the New England Aquarium, Center for Coastal Studies, University of Rhode Island, East Coast Ecosystems, and other whale research organizations have compiled a right whale photo identification catalogue thought to include almost every individual in the population.
The New England Aquarium serves as curator of the catalogue.
By analyzing the life history of whales resighted by the cooperating research groups, as well as mortality records from stranded or floating carcasses, scientists have concluded that the population increased at about 2 percent per year during the mid- to late 1980s, but that it declined by 2 percent per year North Atlantic Right Whale (Eubalaena glacialis) The North Atlantic right whale was the first species of large whale to be hunted and, in many respects, the most highly prized.
Sought relentlessly by commercial whalers from the eleventh century to the mid-twentieth century, North Atlantic right whales were exploited so thoroughly that they were all but eliminated from many parts of their historic range (e.g., 11 MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 Table 1.
Marine mammals listed as endangered (E) or threatened (T) under the Endangered Species Act and depleted (D) under the Marine Mammal Protection Act, as of 31 December 2000 Scientific Name Trichechus manatus Trichechus inunguis Trichechus senegalensis Dugong dugon Status E/D E/D T/D E/D Range Caribbean Sea and North Atlantic from southeastern United States to Brazil; and Greater Antilles Islands Amazon River basin of South America West African coast and rivers; Senegal to Angola Northern Indian Ocean from Madagascar to Indonesia; Philippines; Australia; southern China; Palau Western South America; Peru to southern Chile Central California coast Caribbean Sea and Bahamas (probably extinct) Hawaiian Archipelago Mediterranean Sea; northwest African coast Baja California, Mexico, to southern California North Pacific Rim from California to Japan North Pacific Rim from Japan to Prince William Sound, Alaska to California (west of 144�W longitude) North Pacific Rim from Prince William Sound, Alaska, to California (east of 144�W longitude) Lake Saimaa, Finland Changjiang (Yangtze) River, China Indus River and tributaries, Pakistan Northern Gulf of California, Mexico Eastern tropical Pacific Ocean Eastern tropical Pacific Ocean Atlantic coastal waters from New York to Florida Cook Inlet, Alaska North Atlantic, North Pacific Oceans; Bering Sea South Atlantic, South Pacific, Indian, and Southern Oceans Arctic Ocean and adjacent seas Oceanic, all oceans Oceanic, all oceans Oceanic, all oceans Western North Pacific Ocean Oceanic, all oceans Oceanic, all oceans Common Name Manatees and Dugongs West Indian manatee Amazonian manatee West African manatee Dugong Otters Marine otter Lutra felina Southern sea otter Enhydra lutris nereis Seals and Sea Lions Caribbean monk seal Monachus tropicalis Hawaiian monk seal Monachus schauinslandi Mediterranean monk seal Monachus monachus Guadalupe fur seal Arctocephalus townsendi Northern fur seal Callorhinus ursinus Western North Pacific Eumetopias jubatus Steller sea lion Eastern North Pacific Eumetopias jubatus Steller sea lion Saimaa seal Phoca hispida saimensis Whales, Porpoises, and Dolphins Baiji Lipotes vexillifer Indus River dolphin Platanista minor Vaquita Phocoena sinus Stenella attenuata Northeastern offshore spotted dolphin Eastern spinner dolphin Stenella longirostris orientalis Mid-Atlantic coastal Tursiops truncatus bottlenose dolphin Cook Inlet beluga whale Delphinapterus leucas Northern right whale Eubalaena glacialis Southern right whale Eubalaena australis Bowhead whale Balaena mysticetus Humpback whale Megaptera novaeangliae Blue whale Balaenoptera musculus Finback or fin whale Balaenoptera physalus Western Pacific gray whale Eschrichtius robustus Sei whale Balaenoptera borealis Sperm whale Physeter macrocephalus E/D T/D E/D E/D E/D T/D D E/D T/D E/D E/D E/D E/D D D D D E/D E/D E/D E/D E/D E/D E/D E/D E/D Source: Fish and Wildlife Service regulations at 50 C.F.R. �17.11 and National Marine Fisheries Service regulations at 50 C.F.R. �216.15.
12 Chapter III Species of Special Concern during most of the 1990s.
These trends contrast sharply with those of most other large whale populations, which have increased steadily at annual rates of about 4 percent or more since the cessation of most whaling in the 1980s.
Human-related mortality due to shipping and commercial fishing is considered to be a significant factor limiting right whale population growth.
Over the past decade (19912000), half of all dead right whales found along the U.S. and Canadian coasts (11 of 22 carcasses) have shown evidence of either collision with large ships or entanglement in commercial fishing gear (i.e., gillnets or lines from lobster traps).
Preventing such deaths has become even more urgent because of a series of alarmingly poor calving years.
Between 1982 and 1992, an average of about 12 calves born per year was documented by researchers.
In only two of those years were fewer than 11 calves seen.
In six of the last eight years, however, calf counts have been nine or fewer, despite increased search effort, and in 1998, 1999, and 2000, only six calves, four calves, and one calf, respectively, were seen.
With such low calf production and such a large proportion of mortality due to human causes, prospects for survival of the population are exceedingly grim.
The population's five known high-use habitats include a southern calving area and four northern feeding areas (Fig. 1).
The calving area occurs along the coasts of Georgia and northeastern Florida, where pregnant females, females with newborn calves, and some juveniles typically begin arriving in late December or early January.
By April, most have generally departed on their return migration north.
The location of the rest of the population during these months is largely unknown.
The four northern feeding grounds include two areas off Massachusetts: Cape Cod Bay, with peak periods of abundance typically between February and April, and the Great South Channel east of Cape Cod Bay, with peak abundance usually between April and June.
Two other feeding areas are in Canadian waters: the Bay of Fundy, used principally between August and September, and the Roseway Basin off the southern tip of Nova Scotia, used in late summer and fall (although the area apparently was all but abandoned by right whales throughout much of the 1990s).
Most females with calves seem to prefer the more protected waters of Cape 13 Cod Bay and the Bay of Fundy during the spring and summer, respectively.
The calving grounds and two feeding areas in U.S. waters were designated as critical habitat for North Atlantic right whales under the Endangered Species Act in 1994.
The two feeding areas in Canada have been designated as whale conservation areas.
Neither designation confers specific regulations to protect right whales; however, they have served as a focus for other regulatory and public awareness efforts (see below).
Two other areas that also may be important feeding areas, but are not well studied include Jeffreys Ledge off northeastern Massachusetts and New Hampshire, which is used by right whales in summer and between October and January, and the Georges Basin region, including the northern edge of Georges Bank, which is used in spring.
The National Marine Fisheries Service is responsible for research and management actions to promote the recovery of North Atlantic right whales under both the Marine Mammal Protection Act and the Endangered Species Act.
Much of the research and recovery work, however, depends on independent research groups and the cooperation of other federal and state agencies.
Working with the Service in this regard are the New England Aquarium, the Center for Coastal Studies, the University of Rhode Island, the International Fund for Animal Welfare, East Coast Ecosystems (an independent Canadian research organization), the Humane Society of the United States, the U.S. Navy, the U.S. and Canadian Coast Guards, the Army Corps of Engineers, the Environmental Protection Agency, Canada's Department of Fisheries and Oceans, the Massachusetts Division of Fisheries, the Georgia Department of Natural Resources, the Florida Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission, the University of Georgia, and the Woods Hole Oceanographic Institution.
In 1991, pursuant to provisions of the Endangered Species Act, the Service adopted a recovery plan to organize and guide right whale recovery work.
Subsequently it estab lish e d two regional implementation teams whose members included representatives of many of the agencies and groups noted above.
One team addresses recovery needs for the right whale calving grounds off the southeastern U.S. coast, and the other focuses on right whales, as MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 14 Chapter III Species of Special Concern Figure 1.
(Opposite page) Designated critical habitats and mandatory ship reporting zones for North Atlantic right whales (figure courtesy of Leslie Ward and Alex Smith, Florida Marine Research Institute). well as humpback whales, on feeding grounds off New England.
Periodic team meetings enable participating agencies and groups to review ongoing work, coordinate activities, and develop recommendations for action by the Service.
In addition, the Service established the Atlantic Large Whale Take Reduction Team in 1996.
The principal focus of this team has been to recommend actions to the Service to eliminate entanglement-related deaths and serious injuries of right whales.
Established pursuant to requirements of the Marine Mammal Protection Act, the latter team includes representatives of federal and state agencies, relevant fisheries, environmental organizations, and the research community.
As discussed in previous annual reports, the Commission has participated on all three teams and has periodically reviewed the right whale recovery program to identify needed research and management actions.
The Commission also has provided assistance in developing and carrying out specific recovery tasks.
In 2000 the Marine Mammal Commission and its Committee of Scientific Advisors on Marine Mammals provided comments on the Service's fiscal year 2000 spending plan for work on right whales and reviewed right whale recovery activities during its 1012 October 2000 annual meeting.
In addition, the Commission's staff completed a review of available information on collisions between whales and ships.
These and other matters concerning right whale conservation during 2000 are discussed in the next section.
Right Whale Mortalities and Injuries Data on dead stranded right whales along the east coasts of Canada and the United States were first recorded in 1970.
Since then, 46 dead right whales have been recorded, including one in 2000.
About 40 percent of all documented carcasses (20 of 46) have shown signs of human interactions as the cause of death.
Sixteen had injuries indicating that they were killed by collisions with ships, and four had evidence of entanglement in fishing gear.
Two of the whales killed 15 by ships were also entangled, suggesting that attached fishing gear may have restricted their movements and led to their being hit.
Over the past ten years, since efforts to solicit and respond to reports of floating or stranded right whale carcasses were increased, half of all recorded deaths (11 of 22 carcasses) have had evidence of human causes--nine with ship strike injuries and three entanglements.
The number of dead right whales not observed is almost certainly at least as great as the number documented.
The dead right whale observed in 2000 was found floating 40 miles (64 km) south of Block Island, Rhode Island, on 19 January.
It was initially reported by a fisherman and subsequently videotaped by an aerial survey team sent to confirm the report.
The carcass had fishing gear wrapped around its tail stock.
From data in the right whale photo catalogue, the whale was identified as a three year old (whale #2701) last photographed on 12 September 1999 in the Bay of Fundy with no fishing gear attached.
Bad weather prevented retrieval of the carcass.
Although the attached fishing gear likely caused or contributed to the whale's death, the official cause of death was listed as unknown because the animal was not examined directly.
With the increased right whale survey efforts in recent years, the number of live right whales seen entangled in fishing gear also has increased.
In 1999 six right whales were seen alive, but entangled -- three in the Great South Channel and three in the Bay of Fundy.
Four of these (whales #2753, #2710, #1158, and #2030) were known from the right whale photo catalogue.
Most, but not all gear, was removed from the first three whales during rescue efforts or by the drag of telemetry buoys tied to the end of trailing gear to track the animals.
During 2000 all three animals were resighted gear-free.
Extensive efforts to disentangle the fourth (whale #2030), first seen entangled in May in the Great South Channel, were less successful.
Although much of the gear was removed, a tightly wrapped loop cutting into the body could not be dislodged, and in October 1999 the animal was found dead off southern New Jersey with deep wounds cut into the body cavity by the attached line.
The other two entangled whales were seen only once and photographs sufficient to identify the animals were not taken.
During 2000 at least five other entangled right whales were seen alive.
The first (whale #1130) was MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 initially reported by a right whale aerial survey team on 1 March in Cape Cod Bay.
It was an adult male with line and an attached buoy trailing from its left flipper.
A disentanglement team from the Center for Coastal Studies was dispatched immediately, but was unable to remove the gear before dark.
The whale was not resighted despite aerial searches over the following weeks and had not been seen again by the end of 2000.
In May aerial survey teams operating off Massachusetts documented two entangled right whales.
One was an adult male (whale #1167) first seen on 8 May 40 miles (64 km) northeast of Cape Cod towing a red buoy at the end of 200 feet of line caught in the whale's mouth.
The Center's disentanglement team was able to reach the whale and attach a telemetry buoy to track it, but because the whale did not appear to be badly entangled, it was decided not to attempt to remove the gear.
In October, the animal was resighted in the Bay of Fundy with no gear attached.
The second whale (#1720) was first seen on 31 May 80 (129 km) miles northeast of Cape Cod with line trailing from its mouth.
The entanglement appeared to be minor, warranting monitoring but not intervention.
It was last seen in June with the line still attached.
Figure 2.
North Atlantic right whale found entangled in commercial fishing gear on 9 July 2000 in the Bay of Fundy and subsequently disentangled (photo courtesy of Center for Coastal Studies).
Two other entangled right whales were seen by researchers in the Bay of Fundy during the summer.
On 9 July a juvenile of unknown sex (whale #2746, see Fig. 2) was found with line caught in its mouth and trailing three yellow buoys.
During several rescue attempts, most, and possibly all, of the gear was removed.
The whale was subsequently resighted free of gear.
The other whale was an unidentified adult seen on 18 August trailing about 200 feet of line from its right pectoral fin.
It was not resighted during 2000.
In addition to these entanglements, two other whales with rope or linear scars across their backs (whale #1301 and an animal not yet matched to a catalogued whale) were photographed in Cape Cod Bay by aerial survey teams.
In both cases, the lines were not detected until the photos were examined closely several weeks later.
Neither whale was trailing gear.
The line on one whale (#1301) was first noticed in a photograph taken on 23 March.
The whale was photographed again in April and October with the line still clearly visible.
However, because there was no indication of additional abrasion on the later photos, it seems likely that the line is a scar from a previous entanglement rather than an attached rope.
The line visible on the second animal, photographed on 7 April, also may be a scar.
Congressional Appropriations for Right Whale Recovery Concerned about the species' plight, in September 1999 Congress provided a special $4.1 million appropriation to the National Marine Fisheries Service for work on right whales in Fiscal Year 2000.
In appropriating those monies, Congress directed that they be spent in six areas: developing fishing gear modifications to reduce whale entanglement risks, early warning surveys and acoustic studies, reproductive research, habitat monitoring and population studies, tagging studies, and initiating a National Whale Conservation Fund.
The Service was slow to develop a plan for allocating the appropriation; however, in mid-February 2000 it circulated a draft plan to the Commission and others for review.
The draft included brief descriptions and funding estimates for 46 projects.
The Commission, in consultation with its Committee of Scientific Advisors, reviewed the draft plan and returned comments to the Service on 7 March 2000.
It noted that the draft was a useful document for 16 Chapter III Species of Special Concern seeking views on how the appropriation should be spent.
As a matter of particular concern, however, the Commission noted that several proposed projects called for using the special allocation to pay the salaries of existing Service staff, obligations that presumably should have been covered in the Service's funding base.
The Commission questioned whether this was consistent with Congressional intent and noted that such use of the funds could create serious long-term problems if the Service did not annually request and receive large special appropriations for right whale work, something that had not been included in past budget requests.
The Commission therefore urged the Service to ensure that salaries of staff members needed to address its right whale recovery responsibilities are fully covered in the Service's future base funding requests.
With regard to project proposals, the Commission noted that most project descriptions were too brief to convey precisely what work was envisioned.
Many projects also appeared to assume unstated levels of supplemental funding or support from other agencies and organizations.
The Commission therefore recommended that the Service prepare and circulate a more complete plan after considering reviewers' comments.
The Commission expressed support for many of the proposed projects, including work to disentangle whales, develop fishing gear less likely to entangle whales, operate mandatory ship reporting systems to alert vessel operators of right whale protection needs in key habitats, encourage shipping companies to act in ways that would reduce risks of ship collisions, analyze data on ship traffic in right whale habitats, investigate right whale reproduction problems, and undertake telemetry studies using satellite-linked tags to track right whales.
The Commission also suggested ways of reducing project costs and identified several projects and expenses that it believed were either of low priority or should be funded by sources other than the special appropriation (e.g., paying court fees for right whale related lawsuits and studies of night vision optics to detect right whales).
The Commission recommended that those savings be used to expand vessel support for right whale habitat assessment and monitoring studies, hire a full-time fishing gear specialist to work with the fishing industry on developing and testing gear designs 17 less likely to entangle whales, and support satellite tracking studies for a second year.
As of the end of 2000 it appeared that all of the proposed projects for which the Commission expressed support had been funded.
Several of its recommendations, however, were not addressed.
In the time available to implement its spending plan, the Service was unable to develop and circulate a more detailed plan.
Because of its budgeting practices, the Service also had to use a portion of the special appropriation to pay for salaries of existing staff.
The Service also did not redirect any funding to pay for a second year of satellite tracking work.
Reflecting its continued concern for right whales, Congress passed an appropriation bill on 15 December 2000 that increased funding for right whale work in fiscal year 2001 to $5 million.
The measure directs that tagging studies be made a priority.
To help ensure that the funds are not diverted for other purposes or Service expenses, it also directed that $2.9 million be provided directly to the Northeast Consortium for a competitive grants program on right whales.
The consortium, a nongovernmental group of universities and research organizations in New England, is to use this money to support projects to develop whale-friendly fishing gear, reduce conflicts between right whales and industries, tag and track whales, study acoustics, assess right whale habitats, and develop hydrodynamic models.
The remaining $2.1 million is to be used by the Service to meet its responsibilities for implementing right whale recovery work, including aerial surveys and enforcement.
The measure directs that no more than 30 percent of that amount be used for staff salaries.
Noting delays in developing the fiscal year 2000 spending plan, it also directs the Service to provide the House Committee on Appropriations with a spending plan for fiscal year 2001 by 30 January 2001 and a fiveyear research and management plan for right whales by 31 July 2001.
Preliminary guidelines for the fiscal year 2001 right whale appropriation were set forth in a House Appropriations Committee report released in September 2000.
Plans to address the guidelines were discussed during the Marine Mammal Commission's review of major right whale issues at its 1012 October 2000 annual meeting.
Based on those discussions, the Commission wrote to the Service on 17 November MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 2000 providing recommendations on this and other right whale recovery program needs.
To help ensure that the available funds for fiscal year 2000 are spent efficiently, the Commission recommended that, if it had not already been done, the Service immediately initiate consultations with the Northeast Consortium to develop and agree on work appropriate for funding by the Service and the consortium.
In its 26 December 2000 reply, the Service noted that it had begun consultations with the consortium, but that it could not direct how consortium funds should be spent.
Collisions between Ships and Right Whales Most of the known human-related right whale deaths along the eastern United States and Canada (16 of 19 deaths since 1970) have been caused by collisions between large ships and whales.
Actions by the Commission and other to reduce these risks are discussed below.
Early Warning Systems
As a first step to reduce ship strike risks for right whales, the Navy, the Coast Guard, the Army Corps of Engineers, and the New England Aquarium, in cooperation with the National Marine Fisheries Service, began an early warning system in the winter of 19931994 to advise ships transiting the winter calving grounds off Georgia and Florida where whales were located.
The system relies on daily aerial surveys (weather permitting) over the core of the calving grounds from mid-December through March.
Whale locations are immediately radioed to a sightings clearinghouse maintained by the Navy, which then relays the information to the Coast Guard, regional port officials, port pilots, Navy ships, and others to alert vessel operators.
The Coast Guard provides the sighting information to vessels via broadcast notice to mariners, voice radio, and NAVTEX (a telex communication system onboard most large ships).
By making such information available, it is hoped that vessel operators will be more aware of right whale conservation needs and better able to avoid whales.
Although several close approaches to whales by ships have been observed by aerial survey teams, no documented collisions have been reported in the core calving area since 1993 although one collision was documented off northern Georgia in 1996.
Over the years, the system has been refined and expanded.
With funding from the National Marine 18 Fisheries Service, periodic surveys also are flown outside the core survey area by the Florida Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission and the Georgia Department of Natural Resources.
Reports of opportunistic sightings by mariners and coastal residents also are encouraged and verified by survey teams.
With new communications equipment and procedures, and Navy operation of the sightings clearinghouse, right whale sightings can now be broadcast to mariners within 10 to 15 minutes from the time they are made.
During the first five years of the program, surveys over the core calving area produced approximately 325 sightings of one or more right whales, with an average of about 35 whales identified per year.
As a result, the surveys have been important for research purposes as well as for alerting mariners.
In the past two winters, however, sightings dropped sharply to six in the winter of 19981999 and 12 in the winter of 1999� 2000.
No more than 10 individuals were identified in either year.
In both years, area water temperatures were unusually warm, and in February 2000 the Service supported surveys off North Carolina and South Carolina to determine if whale migrations had terminated in cooler waters north of the traditional calving area.
During seven surveys off the Carolinas in late January and early February, about 15 whales were seen, with only one unconfirmed calf sighting.
Survey efforts for the calving area in the winter of 19992000 therefore produced the lowest calf count to date despite expanded search effort.
The Navy has several bases in Georgia and northeastern Florida and, for the past several years, the commander of the Navy's Atlantic fleet has issued directives that Navy ships transiting the right whale calving grounds during the calving season reduce speed when within 5 nmi of any right whale sighting location less than 12 hours old.
The directive also requires Navy ships to avoid north-south transits of calving grounds and to stay at least 500 yards from any observed right whale.
The directive was reissued for the 19992000 calving season.
On 10 March the Commission wrote to the Navy noting that declining status of the right whale population made the directive, as well as Navy support for aerial surveys and the sightings clearinghouse, more important than ever.
It therefore thanked the Navy for its continuing attention to right whales and commented that its efforts were a Chapter III Species of Special Concern noteworthy example of the Navy's attention to critical environmental protection needs.
In 1996 the Service, the Coast Guard, the Massachusetts Division of Fisheries, and the Center for Coastal Studies began similar programs to survey for right whales and alert ships of their locations in northern feeding areas-- principally Cape Cod Bay and the Great South Channel.
Because of the large expanse of feeding areas, the offshore location of some feeding areas, frequent periods of bad weather, and other reasons, the surveys of feeding areas are usually flown two days per week at most during late winter and spring and less frequently during other times of the year.
Between January and September 2000 the northeast survey programs recorded more than 1,300 right whale sightings, including initial sightings of three entangled whales that served to mobilize disentanglement efforts mentioned earlier.
The surveys also documented temporary feeding concentrations of whales north and east of the designated critical habitat area in the Great South Channel.
Outreach Efforts to Educate Mariners Accompanying these whale sighting programs have been outreach efforts to inform mariners about right whales, whale collision risks, and precautionary needs.
With assistance from the Marine Mammal Commission and other groups, various educational materials were prepared for the Service by the International Fund for Animal Welfare in 1998 and 1999.
These include brochures, placards, videos, and additions to nautical publications, such as regional editions of the United States Coast Pilot and nautical charts.
The Service also prepared magazine articles for professional mariners and information for port entry guides to east coast ports, Notices to Mariners, and Sailing Directions published by the National Imagery and Mapping Agency.
In part, these materials advise mariners to be alert for the presence of right whales and right whalerelated broadcasts in right whale habitats, to assume that whales will not act to avoid oncoming ships, and to exercise caution, including the maintenance of safe speed when within a few miles of a whale sighting location.
At the recommendation of the Commission, the Service also contracted for a study on ways to enlist the cooperation of shipping companies operating in right whale habitats.
This effort has sought help in identifying and carrying out voluntary measures to 19 reduce the risk of ships hitting right whales.
Work on the project began in 1999 and continued during 2000.
To date, regional workshops for officials of shipping companies and ports have been held at most major east coast ports to solicit comments and advice from the shipping community on ways to reduce risks to right whales.
Based on those meetings, the contractor has developed a discussion draft report identifying possible management options, including voluntary and mandatory measures to restrict vessel speeds and routes in right whale habitats.
That report and possible management measures are to be discussed during a workshop with shipping industry representatives in the spring of 2001, after which a report and recommendations will be provided to the Service.
Mandatory Ship Reporting Systems The Service and the Coast Guard, with assistance from the Commission, also sought and received approval from the International Maritime Organization to establish mandatory ship reporting systems in the right whale calving grounds off Georgia and northeastern Florida and in feeding areas off Massachusetts (Fig. 1).
The systems require that operators of commercial vessels greater than 300 gross tons contact a shore station for information on right whales upon entering both areas.
Messages are automatically sent to ships by a satellite communications system, advising mariners of recent right whale sighting locations, the need for caution to avoid whales, and the availability of related advice in regional Coast Pilots.
The ships also must provide information on intended destinations, routes, and speeds to help monitor and assess vessel traffic patterns through right whale habitats.
The two systems, which are funded and operated jointly by the Coast Guard and the National Marine Fisheries Service, went into effect on 1 July 1999.
During their first year of operation, about 1,800 ships reported to the northeast system and 2,000 ships to the southeast system.
At the end of 2000 data on ship routes and speeds reported by those vessels were being analyzed to assess traffic patterns through the areas.
Compilation of Data on Ship-Struck Whales To date, identification of measures vessel operators might take to avoid collisions with whales has been constrained by a lack of information on circumstances and factors surrounding collision events (e.g., the type and speed of involved vessels, the behavior of whales ahead of oncoming ships, etc.).
To help fill this gap, MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 and recognizing the limited data available on collisions with right whales, the Commission organized a study to compile data on collisions between motorized vessels and all species of large whales.
The study, completed in 2000 (see Laist et al. 2001, Appendix C), reviewed historical collision records, recent whale stranding records, anecdotal accounts from vessels involved in collisions, and data on the numbers and speeds of ships over time.
Historical records suggest that ship strikes fatal to whales first occurred late in the 1800s when the speeds of the fastest ships of the day began to reach about 13 to 15 knots.
Of the few early records that were found, several involved passenger liners and warships that were among the few vessels then able to travel at speeds greater than 15 knots.
Collision records remained infrequent until about the 1950s and then increased between the 1950s and 1970s when the number of ships larger than 100 gross tons increased sharply and the speed of most vessels began to increase above 15 knots.
Stranding records indicate that several species of large whales are struck more frequently than previously thought.
For example, between 1975 and 1996, onethird of all dead fin whales found along the U.S. east coast (31 of 92 whales) either were carried into port on the bows of ships or had massive injuries indicating that they had been struck by large vessels.
One-quarter of all dead humpback whales (9 of 36 whales) found between Delaware and Cape Hatteras, North Carolina, also had injuries indicating collisions with large vessels.
Anecdotal descriptions were found for 58 collisions involving at least 10 whale species.
The accounts indicate that all sizes and types of vessels may hit whales, ranging from small outboards to aircraft carriers.
Most severe and lethal injuries, however, involved vessels 80 m or longer.
The smallest vessel involved in a fatal collision was a 20-m high-speed ferry traveling at 45 knots.
Among those accounts with information on whether or when whales were seen before the collision, more than 90 percent reported that the whale was not seen beforehand or seen too late to be avoided.
There were few accounts with information on the behavior of whales before the collision; however, some suggested a last-second flight response by whales when ships approached to within a few tens of meters.
20 From information in the 58 accounts, it appeared that 23 collisions involved whales that were killed, 15 caused severe injuries (i.e., bleeding wounds, some of which may have been fatal), 8 involved minor injuries (wounds or behavior effects but no reports of bleeding), 2 had no apparent effects, and 10 had insufficient information to assess effects.
Among accounts with lethal or severe injuries and data on vessel speed at the time of the collision, nearly 90 percent (25 of 28) involved ships moving at 14 knots or faster and none was moving at less than 10 knots.
In almost all accounts involving minor injuries or no apparent effects, vessels were traveling at less than 10 knots or were small boats a few meters in length.
Because most whales hit by ships apparently are not seen beforehand or are seen too late to be avoided, the analysis concluded that collision avoidance strategies that depend on vessel operators to detect and avoid whales while moving at high speeds are unlikely to be effective for large vessels with limited maneuverability.
Rather, where steps are needed to reduce collision risks, planning appears necessary to avoid or minimize travel distance through high-use whale habitats or to reduce vessel speed in waters where whales are likely to occur.
Regarding the latter point, the analysis suggests that reducing vessel speed to below at least 14 knots would be needed to effectively reduce collision risks.
High-Speed Vessels In recent years high-speed vessels capable of 30 knots or more have entered service in important right whale habitat.
Although these principally include ferries and whale-watching boats, high-speed tankers and freighters also are possible in the foreseeable future.
Because the speed and wake of high-speed vessels pose navigation hazards for other vessels, the Coast Guard published a notice in the Federal Register on 12 April 2000 asking for comments on whether regulations or other actions related to the operation of high-speed vessels are needed to enhance waterway safety.
As indicated above, vessel speed appears to be a factor in collisions between whales and ships, and the Commission therefore wrote to the Coast Guard on 30 June 2000 providing preliminary results of the review of collisions between whales and ships.
In its letter, the Commission noted that six collision accounts compiled in that review (about 15 percent since 1975) involved high-speed vessels, and Chapter III Species of Special Concern that several of those collisions caused significant damage to the vessels, as well as some injuries and one death of humans.
It therefore noted that high-speed vessels could pose risks to whales and, conversely, whales could pose navigation hazards for high-speed vessels.
Because of the declining status of North Atlantic right whales and the high proportion of ship strikes among known causes of right whale mortality, the Commission expressed particular concern about the operation of such vessels in important right whale habitat.
The Commission recommended that the Coast Guard expand the scope of its review to consider whale-related navigation hazards and impacts to whales, and that it consult with the National Marine Fisheries Service to determine whether additional vessel management measures are needed to reduce the impact of high-speed vessels, as well as conventional vessels, in important whale habitats.
A response to the Commission's letter was provided by a representative of the Coast Guard during the Commission's review of major right whale issues at its 1012 October annual meeting and by letter of 24 October 2000.
The Coast Guard advised that although it recognized potential hazards that high-speed vessels pose to whales, its authority to manage vessel traffic stems from the Ports and Waterways Safety Act.
According to the Coast Guard, that Act authorizes it to establish measures to protect navigable waters and their resources from pollution emanating from vessels or from harm resulting from damage, destruction, or loss of vessels, and that it does not have authority to issue regulations to control vessel operation solely for the protection of living marine resources.
Thus, the Coast Guard asserts that it cannot promulgate rules for vessel traffic routes or vessel speed to prevent high-speed vessels from hitting whales.
The Coast Guard also advised that its staff was developing guidelines for the operation of high-speed vessels that would highlight best practices that operators should follow when operating in waters frequented by marine mammals, particularly right whales.
It noted that those guidelines would highlight existing National Marine Fisheries Service regulations to prevent ship strikes, such as the prohibition against approaching right whales closer than 500 yards.
St. Johns River Power Plant In early July 2000 the Commission received an environmental impact statement from the Department of Energy on 21 plans to repower an existing power plant on the St. Johns River, Florida, using technology designed to minimize air pollution.
The new technology requires the delivery of limestone and coke to the plant by ships traveling up the St. Johns River.
Although the ships would have to cross right whale calving grounds off the mouth of the St. Johns River, the statement did not identify the frequency of vessel trips to and from the power plant or consider the potential risk of ship collisions with right whales.
The Commission therefore wrote to the Department on 21 July 2000 noting that vessels servicing the plant could pose a risk to right whales and that results of the study noted earlier suggested that serious injuries to whales appear to be less likely when ships use speeds below 14 knots.
The Commission recommended that the Department require that vessels servicing the plant during the winter right whale calving season limit their speed to below 14 knots when crossing the right whale calving grounds.
The Commission also recommended that the Department consult with the National Marine Fisheries Service to assess the risks of project-related vessel traffic on North Atlantic right whales.
On 27 October 2000 the Department responded to the Commission's letter.
It advised that vessels servicing the power plant would make about 50 deliveries per year, which was less than 2.5 percent of the 2,047 round trips made by large ocean-going vessels using the St. Johns River in 1999.
It also noted that vessels servicing the plant were not expected to travel at more than 12 knots, and that it therefore had concluded that additional measures to protect North Atlantic right whales would not be needed.
The Department also noted that it had contacted the National Marine Fisheries Service as recommended and that the Service had concurred with this assessment.
Vessel-R e l a t e d Management Recommendations During the Marine Mammal Commission's 1012 October 2000 annual meeting, representatives of the Service and other involved groups described recent actions to reduce risks of ships hitting right whales.
Based on that review, the Commission wrote to the Service on 17 November 2000 advising it of the results of a review of information on collisions between whales and ships.
To help mariners determine appropriate actions to minimize the risk of hitting right whales, the MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 Commission recommended that the Service update advice in the United States Coast Pilot, messages sent to ships through the mandatory ship reporting systems, and other educational materials to note that data show that speeds below 14 knots are likely to reduce the risk of fatal or severe injuries to whales.
The Commission also recommended that the Service fund an economic analysis of alternative vessel management measures, including speed reductions, currently being developed under contract to the Service.
Finally, the Commission recommended that the Service's Office of the General Counsel conduct a review of domestic and international authorities that could be used to implement speed and routing measures in right whale critical habitats.
The Service responded to the Commission's letter on 26 December noting that, although it made intuitive sense that slow-moving ships would result in fewer ship strikes, the Service believed it was premature to add new language on ship speed in mariner advisories and education materials and that it planned to forward the Commission's letter to the right whale implementation teams to seek their views.
The letter also advised that the Service planned to provide funds during 2001 to carry out the recommended economic study.
With regard to the legal analysis of potential speed and routing requirements, the Service advised that it would examine the need for such a review after work under the ongoing contract to develop vessel management options was completed.
Entanglement of Right Whales in Fishing Gear A second source of human-related right whale mortality is entanglement in commercial fishing gear, principally gillnets and lines from lobster traps.
Although fewer deaths have been documented from fishing gear than from ship collisions, additional undocumented fishery-related deaths seem likely.
Eight right whales in the population's photoidentification catalogue, last seen with potentially fatal entanglements or related injuries, have not been resighted, either dead or alive.
Pursuant to provisions of the Marine Mammal Protection Act, the National Marine Fisheries Service convened an Atlantic Large Whale Take Reduction Team on 6 August 1996.
The team, which includes representatives of relevant fisheries, federal and state agencies (including the Marine Mammal Commission), 22 environmental organizations, and the research community, was charged with recommending a plan to the Service to reduce the incidental take of whales in gillnet and lobster fisheries along the U.S. Atlantic coast.
Because of their extremely endangered status, right whales have been the primary focus.
The Act requires that incidental take levels be reduced to below a calculated potential biological removal (PBR) level for each affected large whale stock within six months of implementing a plan's measures.
PBR is the number of marine mammals that can be removed from a stock (not including natural mortality) and still have assurance that it would be able to increase toward or remain at its optimum sustainable population.
The PBR level for North Atlantic right whales was initially calculated as 0.4 whales per year but has since been set at zero.
After several meetings, the team recommended measures to the Service in February 1997.
Based in part on those recommendations, the Service adopted interim final rules to implement a take reduction plan for Atlantic large whales on 22 July 1997.
These were adopted with minor changes as final rules on 16 February 1999.
To reduce entanglement risks, the plan relies primarily on seasonal fishing closures in designated right whale critical habitats, gear design requirements thought to reduce the likelihood of whales becoming entangled, research on new gear modifications to reduce entanglement risks, and support for teams of experts trained in disentangling whales.
Disentanglement techniques have been developed by the Center for Coastal Studies in Provincetown, Massachusetts, which recently has been training other teams of researchers and officials.
Disentanglement work is dangerous both for the people working to free whales and for the whales.
Only teams authorized by the Service are allowed to perform this work.
As discussed in the previous annual report, the Commission believed that regulatory measures in the take reduction plan were too weak to offer much protection.
Initial proposals for gear modifications were strongly opposed by the fishing industry because of the cost of modifying their gear and questions about their practicality and effectiveness.
The Service therefore relaxed most of these restrictions to a point where few fishermen were required to make any gear alterations.
Seasonal fishery closures in right whale critical habitat also were weak.
For example, during the Chapter III Species of Special Concern principal period of right whale occurrence in Cape Cod Bay (1 January to 15 May), the closures prohibited gillnet fishing, which had not previously occurred in that area or during that period, but permitted lobster fishing, which had occurred in that area and during that period, subject to certain gear modifications.
Similarly, during the period of principal right whale occurrence in the Great South Channel (1 April to 30 June), the closures prohibited lobster fishing, which had not previously occurred in that area or during that period, but permitted gillnet fishing to continue in that portion of the area where it had previously occurred.
By excluding preferred fishing areas inside designated critical habitats or allowing fishing to continue with some gear modifications, the Service allowed almost all fishing effort that had occurred in the past to continue and possibly expand.
In view of the weak and untested gear requirements and the practical constraints on detecting and freeing all entangled whales, the Commission recommended on several occasions that the Service expand fishery closures to include all areas within designated right whale critical habitat during periods when whales were most abundant.
Commission recommendations in this regard have not been adopted.
Entanglement reports during 1999 indicated that the take reduction plan had not reduced the incidental take of right whales to the level required by the Marine Mammal Protection Act.
The Commission therefore wrote to the Service on 1 October repeating its recommendation that the Service close the gillnet fishing area left open within the Great South Channel critical habitat (i.e., the "sliver" area) before the spring of 2000 when right whale abundance in the area would again peak.
The Service responded on 16 December 1999, noting that it was reviewing data on right whale occurrence in that area, that it planned to reconvene the Atlantic Large Whale Take Reduction Team early in 2000 to consider recommendations for further action, and that it was therefore deferring action in this regard.
Information obtained after the Commission's 1 October letter (i.e., the dead entangled right whale found late in October 1999 off New Jersey, the entangled carcass observed floating off Rhode Island in January 2000, and observations of at least five other entangled whales in 2000) clearly indicates that measures taken under the take reduction plan adopted by the Service in February 1999 have been inadequate.
23 Responsive action by the Service, however, has been slow.
The Service reconvened its Atlantic Large Whale Take Reduction Team on 2324 February 2000 to review the plan's provisions and recent right whale entanglement records.
The team agreed to recommend that new gear modifications be required, including weak links on buoys, anchoring requirements with weak links in the float line at the center of each individual panel on gillnet strings, and restrictions on the number of buoys.
Weak links were recommended on the theory that the pulling force of a whale would result in the release of buoys or net panels, which would limit the drag on entangled whales and improve their chances of freeing themselves.
Restrictions on the number of buoys, achieved mainly by requiring multiple lobster traps rather than a single pot on each buoy, would reduce the number of vertical lines in the water column.
Because it was not known whether such gear modifications would effectively reduce entanglement, the team also reconsidered seasonal fishing closures during times and in areas where right whales are most abundant.
These proposed closures were debated during several subsequent meetings in the spring of 2000.
The team was unable to agree on any measures to expand seasonal closures within designated right whale critical habitat; however, it did agree in concept to a dynamic management system in which an area might be quickly closed on a short-term basis if concentrations of whales were observed to temporarily take up residence.
For example, if a group of right whales was seen feeding in an area on two successive aerial surveys within a period of a few days, the Service would immediately close that area after the second sighting for some designated period (e.g., two weeks), or until subsequent surveys confirmed that whales had left the area.
Criteria for operating such a scheme, such as determining when to close and reopen a temporary whale management area, were suggested, but it was left to the Service to develop details.
It was recognized that such a system could be useful for gillnet fisheries, but would be of limited use for the lobster fishery because of the amount of time needed for lobster fishermen to remove traps.
Based on the team's recommendations, the Service decided to follow a two-step rulemaking process to strengthen its take reduction plan.
First, it would MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 develop interim final rules for new gear modifications agreed to by the team.
These would be published by the end of 2000.
Second, by the summer of 2001, it would develop rules for possible closures.
During the Marine Mammal Commission's review of right whale issues at its 1012 October 2000 annual meeting, representatives of the Service reviewed agency plans.
Because of the species' desperate and worsening plight, the Commission strongly believes that a more aggressive approach is urgently needed, and that management actions must provide greater certainty that entanglement risks will be reduced.
The Commission continues to believe that the best approach is to take immediate action to prevent the deployment of potentially hazardous fishing gear in designated right whale critical habitats when right whales are most abundant.
The Commission therefore wrote to the Service on 17 November 2000, expressing support for the gear modification proposals developed by the Atlantic Large Whale Take Reduction Team.
However, the Commission also recommended that, as part of the interim final rules to amend the take reduction plan, the Service also (1) prohibit either all lobster fishing or all lobster traps with vertical buoy lines in the Cape Cod Bay right whale critical habitat between January and mid-May, and (2) prohibit gillnet fishing throughout the Great South Channel right whale critical habitat in spring.
On 21 December 2000 the Service published interim final rules to implement the new gear modifications.
The rules included no new closure provisions.
Because the Service determined that it would be contrary to the public interest to delay implementation of the measures, the proposed rulemaking stage was bypassed and the interim final rules were scheduled to take effect on 22 January 2001.
The interim final rules expand existing gear modification provisions under the original take reduction plan adopted in February 1999.
The new requirements include weak links for both lobster pot and gillnet buoys, weak links for individual gillnet panels, and restrictions on the number of buoys.
The provisions create a complex system with different combinations of gear modifications required for different times of the year and different geographic areas.
Seven management zones are established for lobster gear and four for gillnets.
Depending on the time and area, weak links for buoys on inshore lobster 24 pots must separate under strains of either 500 or 600 lbs, and buoys for larger offshore lobster pots must separate under a 3,780-lb strain.
In all cases, weak links must separate leaving a knot-free end so that the line will slip more easily through whale baleen.
Although not required, fishermen are encouraged also to use knot-free buoy lines.
In most areas, inshore lobster pots must have at least two traps per buoy.
Weak links for gillnet buoys and net panels must break under a strain of 1,100 lbs.
On 26 December 2000 the Service responded to the Commission's 17 November letter advising that the Commission's recommendations regarding closures were being considered.
The Service noted that it had authority to close the gillnet fishing area within the Great South Channel critical habitat and expected to do so next spring if aerial surveys detected right whales in the area.
The National Whale Conservation Fund The Commission's past reviews of the right whale recovery program have consistently concluded that funding necessary to accomplish important recovery tasks has not been sufficient.
In December 1996 the Commission therefore wrote to the National Marine Fisheries Service recommending that steps be taken to develop a right whale conservation fund supported by industry fees or donations and nongovernmental contributions.
Such a fund could supplement special Congressional appropriations for right whale work and expand the ability to address urgently needed tasks.
The Service expressed support for the idea and, in response to the Commission's recommendation, Senators Judd Gregg and Ted Stevens cosponsored a bill that was passed late in 1998 (P.L. 105-277).
The bill directed the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation, in consultation with the Marine Mammal Commission and the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, to establish a National Whale Conservation Fund.
The purpose of the fund is to provide a means of soliciting voluntary contributions from industry, private foundations, and the general public "to support research, management activities, or educational programs that contribute to the protection, conservation or recovery of whale populations of the United States."
In taking its action, Congress directed that the fund's scope consider needs for all large whales to broaden the base of potential donors and to address funding con- Chapter III Species of Special Concern straints affecting other species.
Congress directed, however, that the fund give priority to the most endangered whale populations, including right whales.
Because no funds were appropriated to initiate fund-raising work and because neither the Foundation, the Commission, or the Service had money to contribute for this purpose, no progress was made on the fund in 1999.
However, late in 1999 Congress directed that the Service provide $250,000 from its fiscal year 2000 right whale budget to the Foundation to begin work on building the new fund.
To plan the fund's development, the Commission convened several meetings involving representatives of the Foundation and the Service early in 2000 and provided advice to the Foundation on needed actions, including the formation of a governing council for the fund, development of marketing and fund-raising strategies, selection of a fund director, and other matters.
The Service transferred the appropriated money, less a mandatory rescission imposed by Congress, to the Foundation early in 2000.
The Commission, in consultation with the Foundation and the Service, wrote to prospective council members to provide background information on the fund and to advise them that an invitation to serve would be forthcoming from the Foundation.
Because of a change in leadership, the Foundation was unable to focus immediate action to develop the fund; however, late in 2000 the Foundation completed a work plan setting forth a schedule of actions to establish the fund, advertised for candidates to fill the position of fund manager, and drafted letters of invitation for membership on the fund's governing council.
As of the end of 2000 it was expected that the letters to prospective council members would be sent early in 2001, and that a portion of the Congressional appropriation plus additional funds raised from other sources would be dispersed as an initial grant-making effort during 2001.
Consistent with Congressional intent, the fund's initial grants are expected to focus on North Atlantic right whales.
A preliminary draft was provided to the Commission during its 1012 October 2000 annual meeting.
At that time the Service advised that the draft had not yet undergone a complete review within the Service, but that it would be provided to other parties involved in right whale recovery work to help ensure that it was as complete and useful as possible.
Based on comments and further internal review, the Service plans to complete a final draft revision that will be made available for public comment.
In September 2000 Canada's Department of Fisheries and Oceans also completed a right whale recovery plan to help direct work in waters under its jurisdiction.
The plan is modeled after the Service's right whale recovery plan, and a Canadian Right Whale Recovery Team has been established to oversee its implementation.
Among other things, the plan calls for considering options to redirect existing vessel traffic through the Bay of Fundy to avoid important right whale habitat.
It also calls for investigating new timearea fishery closures to prevent entanglements, improving regional right whale disentanglement capabilities, and assessing steps to prevent disturbance of right whales by whalewatchers and other vessel operators.
Right Whale Litigation As discussed in previous annual reports, litigation has played an important role in prompting federal and state actions directed at avoiding the taking of right whales.
During 2000 a new lawsuit was filed by the Humane Society of the United States against the Secretary of Commerce and other officials (Humane Society of the United States v. Mineta) seeking to compel the strengthening of regulations designed to reduce the taking of right whales incidental to commercial fishing operations.
In its complaint, filed in the U.S. District Court for the District of Massachusetts, the plaintiff alleges that the Commerce Department has violated the Endangered Species Act by, among other things, its failure to develop and implement plans for the conservation and survival of the North Atlantic right whale and for failing to ensure that the fisheries management program is not likely to jeopardize the species' continued existence.
The complaint further argues that the defendants have violated the Marine Mammal Protection Act by failing to issue regulations 25 North Atlantic Right Whale Recovery Plans At the recommendation of the Marine Mammal Commission, the National Marine Fisheries Service developed a recovery plan for right whales that was adopted in 1991.
Because that plan is now badly out of date, the Service has been developing a draft revision.
MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 that effectively reduce the incidental take of North Atlantic right whales in commercial fishing operations.
Among other things, the plaintiffs allege that the National Marine Fisheries Service has failed to close portions of the area designated as North Atlantic right whale critical habitat to gillnet and lobster fishing and allowed the use of high-risk types of fishing gear in critical habitat at known times of high use by right whales.
The Service is also cited for failing to establish an adequate program of research and development to devise improved fishing methods and gear.
The plaintiff asked the court to compel the Service to issue emergency regulations mandating modifications in lobster and other fishing gear and restricting or completely closing fisheries in areas where right whales are known to aggregate.
In addition, the plaintiff seeks to require the Service to develop performance standards to evaluate the effectiveness of its regulations relating to right whales, and to prohibit deployment of lobster gear using vertical lines in Cape Cod Bay.
The complaint further asked the court to require the Service to convene a shipstrike take reduction team for the purpose of developing an effective take reduction plan that would meet the requirements of the law.
As of the end of 2000 no briefs had been filed or schedule set in this case.
North Pacific Right Whale (Eubalaena japonica) The North Pacific right whale, once abundant over a large part of the North Pacific Ocean, is currently recognized as two populations: one on the western side of the North Pacific and the other on the eastern side.
These populations have distinct catch and recovery histories and non-overlapping feeding grounds.
The extent of possible exchange between the two populations is unknown, and nothing is known about where either of these populations breed and calve.
Both populations were severely depleted by 19th century whaling.
French and American whalers began harvesting North Pacific right whales around 1835.
Logbook data from American whalers show that large catches of right whales were taken in the Gulf of Alaska (which the whalers called the "Kodiak grounds") and in the southeastern Bering Sea (called 26 the "Bristol Bay grounds").
By the late 1850s catch levels for right whales were in major decline on both the Kodiak and Bristol Bay grounds, and whalers had already moved into more northern Arctic waters to hunt the more valuable and more abundant bowhead whale.
Between 1835 and the 1890s, the estimated catch of all North Pacific right whales likely exceeded 15,000 animals, with an additional unknown number of whales struck and killed but not retrieved.
Some North Pacific right whales continued to be taken opportunistically at the end of the nineteenth century and the start of the twentieth century, but mainly during transit to the bowhead whale hunting grounds in the Arctic.
Modern whaling with steam catcher-boats and harpoon cannons began in the early part of the twentieth century, but land-based processing stations limited their hunting range.
By the start of the twentieth century, the whalers had almost succeeded in exterminating the North Pacific right whale.
This is evidenced by the low catch levels reported in the eastern North Pacific during the first three decades of the twentieth century, when fewer than 40 right whales were killed by shore-based operations in Alaska and British Columbia, Canada.
During this period, some recovery of this depleted population must have occurred, and in 1935 many whaling nations adopted an international ban on hunting right whales.
Japan and the Soviet Union, however, did not accept the measure and were not legally bound by its provisions.
After World War II, Soviet and Japanese factory ships conducted whaling operations in the North Pacific.
In 1949 the Convention for the International Regulation of Whaling was concluded and subsequently signed by all major whaling nations, including Japan and the Soviet Union.
The Convention extended the 1935 ban on hunting right whales worldwide although killing right whales for research purposes was allowed subject to unilateral authorization by any member nation.
In the early 1960s pelagic whaling fleets from both Japan and the Soviet Union started to operate in the eastern Bering Sea and the Gulf of Alaska.
Sightings data collected by their whaling operations and reported to the International Whaling Commission suggested that right whales numbered in the low hundreds of animals.
Between 1961 and 1963 the Japanese pelagic whaling fleets operating under a special scientific permit killed nine right whales in the southeastern Bering Sea and the Gulf of Alaska.
Chapter III Species of Special Concern Between 1963 and 1967 Soviet factory ships illegally killed 372 right whale in these same waters.
This catch, however, was not reported and did not become public until 1999.
Since 1968 no hunting has occurred on this population, and by the mid-1970s the Japanese and Soviet pelagic whaling operations moved to more southern parts of the North Pacific.
Thus, few additional right whale sightings were reported.
Little effort and few right whale sightings were made in the northeastern parts of the North Pacific in the 1980s.
During the 1990s infrequent right whale sightings continued to be reported, but the number of individuals seen remained small.
In the late 1990s regular sightings of at least a few individuals were reported in the southeastern Bering Sea, and in 1998 the National Marine Fisheries Service initiated a long-term monitoring program in what was the old Bristol Bay whaling grounds.
The whales using this area, which may number only a few dozen animals, are the remnants of the eastern North Pacific right whale population.
During 1998, 1999, and 2000 the Service recorded sightings of 5, 6, and 13 whales, respectively, in the southeastern Bering Sea.
In 2000 the total search effort in the region nearly doubled that of the previous two years.
Thus, the sightings of 13 whales in 2000 (which included only seven distinctly identified individuals) does not indicate an increase in the number of whales in the region.
The Service has also started a photographic and genetic catalogue of individual whales and some of the same photo-identified whales are been observed between years.
As whaling is not likely to occur anytime in the future in the eastern North Pacific, the fate of highly depleted North Pacific right whale populations will depend on impacts of other human activities on the whales and their habitat.
Nothing is currently known about human interactions with eastern North Pacific right whales; however, as with the North Atlantic right whales (see earlier discussion), the most important problems are likely to include entanglement in fishing gear and ship strikes.
Potential oil and gas development on or near their feeding grounds may also pose a significant risk in the North Pacific.
The eastern North Pacific right whale population is the most endangered and least known whale population in U.S. waters.
These whales, however, are longlived and have a long interval between calves.
To better understand the status of this population and have a 27 chance to save it, a long-term dedicated monitoring program is an essential first step.
Gray Whale (Eschrichtius robustus) Gray whales are found only in the North Pacific Ocean, where they comprise two discrete stocks--the eastern (or California) stock and the western (or Asian) stock.
The eastern North Pacific stock migrates seasonally between winter calving lagoons off Baja California, Mexico, and summer feeding grounds in the Bering and Chukchi Seas between Alaska and Russia.
The western North Pacific stock migrates between winter calving areas along the coast of China and summer feeding grounds in the Okhotsk Sea mainly off the northeastern coast of Sakhalin Island, Russia.
Overexploitation by commercial whaling in the mid-1800s and early 1900s severely depleted both stocks.
As a result, gray whales, along with right whales, were the first whale species afforded protection from commercial whaling under an international ban adopted by the League of Nations in the mid-1930s.
The ban was subsequently extended by the 1946 International Convention for the Regulation of Whaling.
Under these protective measures, eastern North Pacific gray whales made a substantial recovery although certain threats to the population and its habitat remain.
The western stock, which was reduced to a much lower level, has not recovered, and its current population is estimated at 100 individuals.
In light of their precarious status, gray whales were listed as endangered throughout their range under the U.S. Endangered Species Conservation Act of 1969, the predecessor to the Endangered Species Act of 1973.
Because of the eastern stock's recovery, it was removed from the endangered species list in June 1994, but the western stock remains listed as endangered.
The National Marine Fisheries Service is the lead federal agency responsible for the conservation of gray whales.
Recent activities related to both the eastern North Pacific and western North Pacific stocks are discussed in the following sections.
The Eastern North Pacific Stock The eastern stock of gray whales was thought to have been reduced to a few thousand animals when the ban on commercial whaling for gray whales first went MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 into effect.
The National Marine Fisheries Service has surveyed this stock on its southward migration in 20 of the past 34 years as part of an effort to monitor its size and trend.
Throughout this period, the population increased steadily.
Based on results of the most recent survey, conducted in 19971998, the population currently is estimated to number 26,600 whales, a level thought to be within its optimum sustainable population range or perhaps just below it.
Since 1994 the Service also has surveyed whales migrating northward to assess calf production.
Results through 1998 indicate that calves have accounted for between 2.6 and 6.5 percent of the population.
In 1999 this figure dropped to 1.6 percent and, based on preliminary estimates, declined further to 1 percent in 2000.
Gray Whale Strandings in 2000 During 1999 a total of 273 gray whales stranded and died along the west coast of North America from Alaska to Mexico, compared with the previous record number of 87 deaths.
The occurrences precipitated consultations between the National Marine Fisheries Service and the Working Group on Marine Mammal Unusual Mortality Events.
To prepare for the possibility that high numbers of gray whale strandings would continue in 2000, the Commission wrote to the Service on 10 December 1999 recommending that steps be taken to complete a die-off response plan immediately.
In 2000 a total of 355 dead gray whales was reported along the coasts of Mexico, the United States, and Canada.
Information on the unusual number of gray whale strandings that have occurred during the two years and actions taken to investigate the cause are discussed in Chapter VI. Five-Year Status Review The eastern North Pacific stock of gray whales was removed from the Endangered Species Act list of endangered and threatened wildlife on 16 June 1994.
To help ensure that such delisting actions are prudent, the Act requires that the responsible agency monitor a species' status for at least five years after it is removed from the list.
As discussed in the Commission's 1999 report, on 1617 March 1999 the Service convened a workshop to review the results of its five-year research program as well as other information bearing on the status of eastern North Pacific gray whales.
The results and findings of the workshop were summarized in an August 1999 report prepared by the Service.
28 With regard to the stock's status, participants concluded that the eastern North Pacific stock did not meet established criteria for listing as either threatened or endangered and that no action was warranted to relist it under the Act.
Monitoring studies indicate that the stock continued to increase after it was delisted.
When the stock was delisted in 1994, it was estimated to number 23,100 whales.
Based on the most recent analysis of stock size, which was derived from counts along the California coast during the stock's southbound migration in the winter of 19971998, it is estimated to number 26,635 whales, with a 95 percent confidence interval ranging from 21,878 to 32,427.
Modeling analyses indicate that the stock has increased at an average rate of about 2.5 percent per year since the late 1960s.
Workshop participants also recommended that monitoring studies be continued for another five-year period (i.e., 19992004), in part because the stock offers a unique opportunity to assess how a cetacean population responds to natural and anthropogenic influences as it approaches and attains its maximum carrying capacity level.
The participants therefore identified and ranked priority research needs.
In decreasing order of priority, they recommended that (1) annual surveys of whales migrating southward along the California coast be continued to monitor population size, (2) studies of gray whales and the effects of human activity and development in winter calving and nursing lagoons in Mexico be continued, (3) photogrammetry studies be undertaken to assess the condition of whales, (4) calf counts be continued at selected sites in California and Mexico, and (5) surveys be undertaken in the Bering and Chukchi Seas to examine the effects of environmental parameters, particularly climate warming, on whale foraging patterns.
During the Marine Mammal Commission's 1921 October 1999 annual meeting, representatives of the Service provided information on the status of eastern North Pacific gray whales.
Although noting that workshop participants had recommended that efforts to monitor this stock be continued for another five-year period, the Service advised the Commission that it had neither committed funds to do so nor had it made plans to continue cooperative work with Mexican officials to ensure that critical calving and nursing lagoons are not Chapter III Species of Special Concern degraded by development.
In light of this information, the Commission wrote to the Service on 10 December 1999.
Noting the importance of detecting any downturn in future population growth and the value of further population data for developing models to assess recovery patterns of other large whale populations, the Commission recommended that the Service provide funds to continue its gray whale monitoring program.
Specifically, the Commission recommended that the Service (1) continue counts of adults and calves and photogrammetry studies during northbound migrations for at least the next three years at a cost of $65,000 $75,000 per year, (2) conduct a population count during the southbound migration in 2001 at a cost of about $60,000, and (3) continue to assist Mexican scientists with their efforts to prevent degradation of critical calving and nursing lagoons in Baja California, Mexico.
Potential Threats to Calving and Nursing Lagoons The eastern North Pacific gray whale population migrates southward to coastal waters along the western shore of Mexico's Baja California peninsula each winter.
There, a series of coastal bays and lagoons (principally Magdalena Bay, Laguna San Ignacio, Ojo de Liebre, and Guerrero Negro) provide protected waters where pregnant females give birth and nurse their young before returning to northern feeding grounds.
With the exception of Guerrero Negro, where a salt evaporation facility has been operating since the 1950s, the bays are largely undeveloped.
In 1976 three of the coastal lagoons (San Ignacio, Ojo de Liebre, and Guerrero Negro) were designated by Mexico as the Whale Sanctuary of El Vizcaino.
In 1988 they also were designated as the Vizcaino Biosphere Reserve, part of a United Nations system of internationally significant natural areas, and in 1993 they received further recognition and protection as a Natural World Heritage Site.
In the mid-1990s proposals were put forth for two development projects that could significantly affect the whales' use of two of the stock's most important calving lagoons.
In one instance, a Japanese consortium proposed building a 2,000-ha tourist resort on Magdalena Bay.
Plans were later deferred--possibly because of the economic recession in Japan--but may be revived at a later date.
Another potential threat was a proposal, put forth in 1994 by Mitsubishi Corporation and the Mexican government, through a joint venture known as Exportadora de Sal, S.A. (ESSA), to con29 struct a large salt evaporation facility on the shores of Laguna San Ignacio.
The importance of the lagoon for gray whales and the potential effects of the proposal prompted a high level of concern in Mexico and internationally.
As initially proposed, this salt evaporation project would have involved constructing 116 square miles (300 sq km) of evaporating ponds along the lagoon's shoreline, building a 1.25-mile-long (2 km) pier for loading salt onto oceangoing ships, and installing pumps to siphon 6,000 gallons (22,710 liters) of seawater per second from the lagoon into the evaporation ponds.
Barge traffic and noise from the facility could disrupt and displace calving and nursing whales, and spills of fuel, brine, or other chemicals could pose pollution risks.
Although inclusion of the lagoon in the Vizcaino Biosphere Reserve served to recognize the importance of the area's natural resources, including gray whales, the lagoon was within a reserve buffer zone where development consistent with the reserve's conservation objectives could proceed.
In 1995 the Mexican environmental secretariat rejected the proposal on grounds that it was incompatible with objectives of the biological reserve.
After initially appealing the finding, Mitsubishi and ESSA withdrew the proposal and announced plans to redesign the project.
Subsequently, ESSA contracted with independent scientists for an environmental impact assessment of the proposed project.
In addition, the lower house of the Mexican Congress established a 12-member commission in 1998 to examine environmental impacts associated with both the existing salt evaporation facility at Guerrero Negro, which is also operated by Mitsubishi and ESSA, and the planned facility at Laguna San Ignacio.
The environmental assessment on the proposed project was completed early in 2000.
It concluded that construction and operation of the facility would have no detrimental effects on gray whales.
Specifically, it noted that construction of the channel between the pumping station and San Ignacio Lagoon would be carried out at times when gray whales are not present.
The amount of water pumped from the lagoon (estimated at 0.2 percent of the amount entering the lagoon daily) would be so small as to have no effect on the water level or salinity of the lagoon.
The proposed disposal system to pump brine back into the lagoon MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 would be operated only during periods when gray whales were not present, and vessels carrying salt from the pier (an estimated 10 trips per month) would travel at speeds of 23 knots, "greatly reducing the chances of any collisions between whales and ships."
On 3 March 2000 Mitsubishi Corporation, the Mexican government, and ESSA jointly announced that they were canceling the proposed saltworks project at San Ignacio Lagoon.
Despite the fact that the environmental assessment concluded that the proposed saltworks would not adversely impact the lagoon, gray whales using the lagoon, or other plant and animal species, the consortium noted that there were other factors that must be considered.
These included the impact of a project of this magnitude on the integrity of the area as well as public opposition to the project.
Subsistence Take of Gray Whales Gray whales are taken for subsistence purposes by Native residents in both Russia and the United States.
Between 1966 and 1991, an average of 177 gray whales was taken annually for this purpose, almost all in Russia.
Between 1994 and 1998, the take of gray whales ranged from 42 to 122 whales.
During that period only two gray whales were taken in the United States, both by Alaska Natives in 1995.
The International Whaling Commission (IWC) is responsible for setting catch limits for aboriginal subsistence whaling.
The current quota for gray whales, adopted in 1997, was established as a five-year block quota of 620 whales, with no more than 140 whales to be landed in any one year.
Under a subsequent bilateral agreement between Russia and the United States, Russia agreed to limit its take to 135 whales and the United States agreed to limit its take to 5 whales.
During 2000 Russian whalers took 113 whales.
As discussed below, U.S. Natives took no whales in 2000.
In May 1995 the Makah Tribal Council of Washington State expressed an interest to the Departments of Commerce and State in renewing a hunt for gray whales.
Whaling had been a traditional part of the tribe's way of life for more than 1,000 years until it ceased in the 1920s when gray whales became scarce as a result of depletion by commercial whalers.
Citing its whaling rights under the 1855 Treaty of Neah Bay, the tribe asked that the federal agencies seek approval from the IWC for an annual ceremonial harvest of up to five gray whales.
The agencies agreed, and a proposal to take five whales per year was put 30 forward to the IWC at its 1996 meeting.
The proposal raised questions about the purpose and need for the take, and at the tribe's request, it was withdrawn to develop additional background information.
A new proposal for an annual harvest of up to five whales, augmented with additional background information, was submitted to the IWC for consideration at its 1997 meeting.
At that meeting, the IWC adopted a resolution proposed jointly by the U.S. and Russian delegations approving the above-mentioned five-year block quota and noting that "meat and products of such whales are to be used exclusively for local consumption by the aborigines whose traditional subsistence and cultural needs have been recognized."
With regard to the gray whale quota, the Russian Federation agreed to take no more than 135 whales per year, leaving five whales available to be taken by Makah whalers.
Although the U.S. delegation interpreted the resolution as recognition of the Makah's cultural and subsistence needs, some delegations questioned that interpretation and contended that the Makah were not entitled to hunt gray whales because their needs had not yet been demonstrated.
A lawsuit was subsequently filed against the Department of Commerce on 17 October 1997 by Rep. Jack Metcalf of Washington State and several environmental groups.
The suit challenged the Department's actions to promote and authorize whaling by the Makah.
A ruling in the case, issued on 21 September 1998 by the District Court for the Western District of Washington, granted the federal defendant's motion for summary judgment and cleared the way for Makah whaling to begin.
The court found that the Makah Tribe had a cultural and subsistence need for whaling and that the Secretary of Commerce's approval of the quota did not violate the International Convention for the Regulation of Whaling, the Whaling Convention Act, or applicable regulations.
In 1998 the Makah Whaling Commission, established to govern whaling efforts by the tribe, adopted a management plan for the years 19982002.
Among other things, the plan calls for issuing permits to tribal whalers, limiting the harvest to landings of no more than five gray whales per year, targeting only migrating adult whales not accompanied by a calf, using specified hunting methods, and using landed whales only for traditional handicrafts, consumption by local residents, and ceremonial purposes.
A small number of gray Chapter III Species of Special Concern whales apparently remain throughout the summer to feed off western Washington where Makah whaling was to take place.
To help prevent hunting of these few summer resident whales, the National Marine Fisheries Service wrote to the Makah Tribal Council on 6 March 1998 expressing its understanding that hunting would occur only from early November through the end of June or at other times when the Service and the tribe determined that gray whales were migrating.
Notwithstanding these actions, Makah whalers made no attempts to hunt gray whales during 1998.
In the spring of 1999, however, Makah whalers put to sea in a cedar canoe accompanied by a motorized chase boat to renew the tribe's whaling tradition.
From its initial announcement of an intent to resume a hunt for gray whales, the Makah's whaling plans have been the focus of sharp criticism and intense protest by people opposed to the killing of whales and concerned that the action could set a precedent for the resumption of other whaling.
When the legal action noted earlier failed to block the tribe's plans, antiwhaling activists attempted to prevent the hunt by running boats between the tribe's whaling canoe and targeted whales.
This prompted the arrest of several activists by the Coast Guard early in May 1999 at the start of the hunt.
With a close Coast Guard vigil, however, the hunt continued.
After one whale, struck a glancing blow by a harpoon, escaped alive in early May, Makah whalers succeeded in killing and landing a gray whale on 17 May 1999.
That was the only whale landed by the Makah during the year.
Following the September 1998 ruling that cleared the way for the Makah whaling, plaintiffs in the lawsuit (Metcalf v. Daley) filed an appeal.
On 9 June 2000 the Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals overturned one aspect of the district court decision.
The circuit court ruled that the 1997 environmental assessment should have been completed before the Service and the Makah Tribe entered into a cooperative agreement.
The court held that the timing of the environmental assessment, which was completed after the 1996 agreement was signed and before the 1997 meeting of the IWC, may have predisposed the preparers to find that the whaling proposal would not significantly affect the environment.
As a result, on 11 August 2000 the Service rescinded its cooperative agreement with the Makah Tribe and subsequently set the 2000 gray whale quota at zero.
At the end of 2000 the Service was completing a new environmental assessment on issuing a quota to the 31 Makah Tribe for the years 2001 and 2002.
The assessment was expected to be available for comment early in January 2001.
The Western North Pacific Gray Whale Stock As recently as the 1970s the western North Pacific or Asian gray whale was thought to have been extirpated by whaling activity.
A small remnant population, however, is now known to have survived.
Its range extends from the Okhotsk Sea to the South China Sea.
Based on findings from an ongoing U.S.Russia photo-identification project, the total population size is thought to be approximately 100 individuals.
Because of the very small size of the surviving population and the possibility that fewer than 50 reproductive individuals may remain, The World Conservation Union (IUCN) listed the western gray whale as "critically endangered" in 2000.
Current threats to western gray whales include low-level mortality resulting from an undetermined level of poaching likely to be occurring in the northern Sea of Japan and the potential for incidental catches throughout most of their range, particularly in the extensive coastal net fisheries off southern China.
Substantial nearshore industrialization and ship traffic throughout the population's migratory corridors also represent potential threats by increasing the likelihood of exposure to chemical pollution and ship strikes.
Perhaps even more worrisome is current and planned offshore oil and gas development in the South China Sea and within 20 km of the population's only known feeding ground off the northeastern coast of Sakhalin Island in the Okhotsk Sea.
Anthropogenic activities related to oil and gas exploration, including high-intensity geophysical seismic surveying, drilling operations, increased ship and air traffic, and oil spills, all pose potential threats to gray whales.
For example, displacement of whales from critical feeding, migratory, and breeding habitat is possible due to disturbance from underwater industrial noise.
Physical habitat damage from drilling and dredge operations, and possible impacts of oil and chemical spills on benthic prey communities also warrant concern.
In 1995 Russian and U.S. scientists initiated a cooperative research program off northeastern Sakhalin Island to monitor the population status of western gray whales.
Funding for the program has MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 come largely from the oil and gas consortia involved in developing the region.
Research findings to date have provided vital new information on the status of the western population and the nature and magnitude of ongoing threats to its survival.
Based on research conducted through 2000, a total of 94 individual whales has been photo-identified.
However, during the summer-autumn 2000 field season, only three previously unidentified noncalf whales were photographically captured, resulting in a 95 percent resighting rate from previous years.
The low rate at which new individuals are now being identified suggests that a majority of the western gray whale population has been identified.
The high level of annual return and seasonal site fidelity of identified whales to the Sakhalin study site shows that this region is the primary feeding area for the population.
Mothers with calves and pregnant females have been identified in the study area annually and are among the most frequently sighted individuals.
Sixteen calves and 12 mothers have been observed on the feeding grounds between 1995 and 2000.
Of the 13 calves identified between 1995 and 1999, eight (61.5 percent) have not been resighted after the year of their birth, and five (38.5 percent) have been observed in at least one additional year.
If calf return rates correspond with calf survivorship, these findings suggest that calf mortality within the first year is high.
Reproductive females, both lactating and pregnant, have especially high energetic demands, making it imperative that their feeding grounds continue to be capable of meeting their high metabolic requirements.
The pronounced seasonal site fidelity and annual return of reproductive females to the study site, combined with their need for highquality habitat, indicate that the waters off northeastern Sakhalin Island are critically important to the survival of this whale population.
In this regard, observations during 1999 and 2000 of unusually thin gray whales on these feeding grounds are of major concern.
Although photo and video analyses have yet to be completed for data collected in 2000, approximately 20 to 25 whales were tentatively identified as being thin.
Similar observations of fewer animals were documented in 1999.
In addition, the overall distribution of whales on the feeding grounds during 19992000 appears to have shifted to the north compared with that observed 32 between 1997 and 1998.
Although the factors responsible for the changes in whale distribution and individual physical condition are currently unknown, the influence of offshore oil and gas activities cannot be ruled out.
Biopsy samples have been collected from 64 of the 94 individual whales identified to date.
DNA comparisons indicate that eastern and western gray whales can be genetically differentiated at the population level.
Based on differences in haplotypic frequencies, they appear to be geographically isolated population units.
However, because population differentiation is based on statistical differences in haplotypic frequencies and associated haplotypic diversity indices, the origin of single individuals cannot be determined with certainty.
Recent molecular analyses of whale meat samples purchased from a Japanese market in August and October 1999 showed that they were from a gray whale.
Mitochondrial DNA sequences obtained from those samples were identical (the same haplotype) to those of a gray whale killed off western Hokkaido in May 1996 and were also identical to the most common haplotype found in both western and eastern gray whale populations.
Based on the geographic location where the whale was found, the historical occurrence of gray whales in the Sea of Japan, and the freshness of the specimen, it was therefore concluded that this whale likely came from the western population.
Without additional analyses, however, it is uncertain if the gray whale market samples are from the Hokkaido whale or another individual.
There is an urgent need to continue and expand long-term research and monitoring of the western gray whale population.
Studies of this population between 1997 and 2000 were financed largely by an oil consortium, Sakhalin Energy Investment Company.
Marathon Oil, the primary shareholder and operator of the offshore oil and gas field (Sakhalin II) in closest proximity to the western gray whale feeding grounds, transferred its interest in the Sakhalin II project to Shell Sakhalin Holdings B.V. (an affiliate of Royal Dutch/Shell, The Netherlands) at the end of 2000.
As a result, future industry-based funding for continued studies on this endangered population now falls under the jurisdiction of Shell.
If survival of western gray whales is to be ensured, wider international research collaboration in com- Chapter III Species of Special Concern bination with an adequate and stable funding base, effective protection measures, and cooperation between scientists, industry, and government officials are essential.
Gulf of Maine Harbor Porpoise (Phocoena phocoena) Harbor porpoises live in coastal waters throughout cold and temperate regions of the Northern Hemisphere.
About 1.5 m (5 ft) long when fully grown, harbor porpoises are among the smallest of all cetaceans.
They also are among the shortestlived cetaceans.
Studies of harbor porpoises off the east coast of the United States and Canada suggest that few live longer than 10 years, and most survive only seven or eight years.
Individuals become sexually mature at about three years of age, with most adult females bearing a single calf annually.
Their diet is principally small schooling fish, such as herring and hake.
Harbor porpoises are caught incidentally throughout their range in coastal gillnet fisheries targeting various finfish species.
In many areas, so many are caught that local harbor porpoise abundance has been substantially reduced.
Harbor porpoises occur in relatively discrete populations whose ranges may overlap seasonally.
In the western North Atlantic Ocean, there appear to be four local populations.
The southernmost is the Gulf of Maine/Bay of Fundy harbor porpoise stock (hereafter called simply the Gulf of Maine stock).
During summer, this population is restricted almost entirely to cold waters in the Gulf of Maine and the Bay of Fundy off New England and southeastern Canada.
In fall and winter, its range expands as cold waters sweep south along the coast and, by late winter, Gulf of Maine harbor porpoises can be found over the continental shelf from the Gulf of Maine to Cape Hatteras, North Carolina.
The other three western North Atlantic stocks are centered in the Gulf of St. Lawrence, along the east coast of Newfoundland, and off the west coast of Greenland in summer.
The winter ranges of these other stocks are uncertain; however, recent genetic analyses of animals found off the eastern United States suggest that some individuals from one or more of these more 33 northerly stocks also move south in winter to waters between New York and North Carolina.
For several decades, large numbers of harbor porpoises have been caught incidentally in gillnet fisheries in the Bay of Fundy and the Gulf of Maine.
This bycatch began in the 1960s when Canadian fishermen in the Bay of Fundy first began using gillnets to catch groundfish (i.e., cod, flounder, and haddock).
In the 1970s the use of gillnets spread to the U.S. waters in the Gulf of Maine.
Although harbor porpoise bycatch in these fisheries was largely unrecorded and ignored before the mid-1980s, by the late 1980s studies of harbor porpoise biology and bycatch reports from some areas suggested that the number of porpoises being killed could be having a substantial effect on the regional population.
In the early 1990s as stocks of groundfish were depleted, New England fishermen began using gillnets to catch monkfish and dogfish in addition to groundfish, and these fisheries also began taking harbor porpoises incidentally.
To assess effects of these fisheries on the region's harbor porpoise population, the National Marine Fisheries Service began efforts to estimate the size of the harbor porpoise stock and the number of porpoises being caught.
To estimate the size of the Gulf of Maine stock, the Service conducted surveys in 1991, 1992, and 1995 during the summer when most of the stock is confined to the Gulf of Maine and the Bay of Fundy.
Harbor porpoises are difficult to survey because of their small size, the short amount of time they spend at the surface to breath, year-to-year changes in distribution depending on local water temperature patterns, and other factors.
As a result, the population estimates derived from survey data have had wide confidence intervals.
To develop a best estimate, the Service pooled results of the first three surveys and calculated a Gulf of Maine population size of 54,000 porpoises with a 95 percent confidence interval of 41,300 to 71,400.
Applying this estimate to a formula designed to calculate a stock's potential biological removal level (PBR), the Service calculated that 483 porpoises could be removed from a stock annually, in addition to natural mortality, and still have assurance that the stock would increase toward its optimum sustainable population level.
MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 Table 2.
Estimates of harbor porpoise bycatch in sink gillnet fisheries in the Bay of Fundy (Canada), New England (U.S.) and off the U.S. mid-Atlantic states, 1990-19991 New England 2,900 2,000 1,200 1,400 2,100 1,400 1,200 782 332 270 2 Year 1990 1991 1992 1993 1994 1995 1996 1997 1998 1999 1 2 Bay of Fundy 3 U.S. Mid-Atlantic4 103 311 572 446 53 (11254) (162567) (2961,071) (294894) (3-98) Other5 19 Total 1,590 1,530 1,397 788 362 (1,5005,000) (1,0003,800) (8001,700) (1,000� 2,000) (1,4002,900) (9002,500) (8001,800) (5011,208) (170728) (78-364) 424 (200648) 101 (80122) 87 20 43 10 
Palka, D. 1997.
Gulf of Maine Harbor Porpoise By-catch.
Prepared for the Gulf of Maine Harbor Porpoise Take Reduction Team Meeting, December 16-17, 1997.
National Marine Fisheries Service, Woods Hole, Massachusetts.
Estimates for 1997, 1998, and 1999 are from unpublished National Marine Fisheries Service data.
3 Trippel, E.A. 1998.
Harbour Porpoise By-Catch in the Lower Bay of Fundy Gillnet Fishery.
DFO Maritime Regional Fisheries Status Report 98/7E.
Canadian Department of Fisheries and Oceans, Dartmouth, Nova Scotia.
Estimate for 1999 is from unpublished data provided by E. A. Trippel.
4 Palka, D. 1997.
Mid-Atlantic Harbor Porpoise By-catch and Gear Characteristics.
Prepared for the Gulf of Maine Harbor Porpoise Take Reduction Team Meeting, 16-17 December 1997.
National Marine Fisheries Service, Woods Hole, Massachusetts.
Estimates for 1997, 1998, and 1999 are from unpublished National Marine Fisheries Service data.
5 Harbor porpoise strandings with signs of gillnet fisheryrelated interactions in areas of the U.S. mid-Atlantic region not monitored by fishery observers.
During the summer of 1999 the Service conducted another Gulf of Maine harbor porpoise survey.
Data analyses from that survey, completed in 2000, produced a new population estimate of 89,700 porpoises, with a 95 percent confidence interval of 53,400 to 150,900.
Although the new estimate was significantly larger than the estimate from the 1991 survey, it was not statistically different from estimates based on the 1992 and 1995 surveys.
Because of the increased area surveyed, the 1991 survey is not directly comparable with any of the previous surveys; thus, trends in population size since the early 1990s remain unknown.
Because of these factors and the elapsed time between the 1991 and 1999 surveys, the recent results are not being pooled with earlier survey data.
Based on the population estimate for 1999, the Service calculated a new PBR level of 747 porpoises per year.
34 To estimate bycatch levels, late in the 1980s the Service began placing observers on a sample of boats gillnet fishing for groundfish in the Gulf of Maine.
Among other things, the observers collect data on the number of harbor porpoises and the amount of fish caught during observed gillnet hauls.
From that data, they calculate regional harbor porpoise bycatch rates that can then be expanded into regional bycatch estimates based on records of total landings by the fishery.
The Canada Department of Fisheries and Oceans began a similar program in 1993 for gillnet boats operating in the Bay of Fundy.
Early in the 1990s the U.S. observer program was expanded to cover gillnet fisheries that had developed for monkfish and dogfish off New England.
As these fisheries, as well as gillnet fisheries for shad, weakfish, bluefish, and rockfish developed south of New England, dead harbor porpoises with net marks Chapter III Species of Special Concern and attached net fragments began washing ashore between New York and North Carolina.
The Service therefore expanded its observer program to monitor gillnet fisheries in those areas as well.
Results of harbor porpoise bycatch monitoring efforts through 1999 are shown in Table 2.
Estimates for 2000 were not available as of the end of 2000; however, preliminary information through August suggested that, at least for New England fisheries, bycatch estimates for 2000 would be comparable with those of 1999.
Estimates for the mid-Atlantic area were less certain because data on total fishing effort for the various regional gillnet fisheries were not yet available.
To various degrees, annual bycatch estimates have been incomplete because of a lack of observer effort among some gillnet fisheries that incidentally take harbor porpoises.
For example, early in the 1990s no estimates were available for Canadian fisheries in the Bay of Fundy where hundreds of porpoises were then being taken.
Even recent U.S. and Canadian estimates may not include all gillnet fisheries in which harbor porpoises are taken.
In 1999, 38 dead harbor porpoises stranded along the U.S. east coast with net marks indicating that they died in gillnets.
About half of those stranded during times and in areas along mid-Atlantic states where there had been almost no observer effort, and thus the fisheries responsible are largely unknown.
Nevertheless, bycatch estimates strongly indicate that there has been a substantial decline in the number of porpoises caught in recent years.
Whereas several thousand porpoises were caught annually early in the 1990s, estimates since 1998 have been in the mid- to low hundreds.
In part, this reduction is due to measures adopted specifically to reduce porpoise bycatch.
Such measures were first implemented for gillnet fisheries in 1994 by Canada's Department of Fisheries and Oceans in the Bay of Fundy and by the National Marine Fisheries Service in the Gulf of Maine.
For the waters off U.S. mid-Atlantic states, bycatch reduction measures were first implemented in 1999.
Another perhaps equally important factor, however, has been the significant reduction in fishing effort brought about by the severe decline of groundfish stocks and increasingly stringent measures to reduce fishing effort implemented since the 35 mid-1990s in both U.S. and Canadian waters.
Restrictive fishing reduction measures also have been implemented over the past two years to manage overfished stocks of dogfish and monkfish.
Although recent bycatch estimates are below the currently estimated PBR level of 757 porpoises per year, bycatch reduction measures continue to require close attention.
At least some stocks of groundfish off New England are showing signs of recovery, and future actions to relax fishery conservation measures put in place to protect fish stocks could increase fishing effort and thereby increase harbor porpoise bycatch.
In addition, amendments to the Marine Mammal Protection Act adopted in 1994 establish a goal of reducing all marine mammal bycatch, including harbor porpoises, to insignificant levels approaching zero by April 2001.
Accordingly, as discussed further later in this section, the National Marine Fisheries Service, commercial gillnet fishermen, environmental groups, and other concerned parties have continued to focus attention on research and management needs to further reduce the bycatch of harbor porpoises in gillnets.
Harbor Porpoise Management Actions Prior to 1999 The effort to reduce harbor porpoise bycatch has been a highly charged issue for gillnetters along the east coast and for conservationists.
Early in the 1990s there was no apparent way to prevent the incidental catch of harbor porpoises in gillnets other than seasonally closing areas where harbor porpoises were caught.
Because fishery managers at that time were attempting, to the extent possible, to control overfishing of groundfish stocks by means other than seasonal closures (e.g., catch limits and limits on days at sea), gillnetters feared that closures to prevent harbor porpoise bycatch, on top of measures to conserve fish stocks, would effectively shut down the fisheries.
Because of this and similar issues involving other fisheries and other marine mammals in U.S. waters, Congress amended the Marine Mammal Protection Act in 1994 to establish a new approach for managing the incidental take of marine mammals in U.S. fisheries (see also Chapter IV).
The amendments require the National Marine Fisheries Service to prepare and periodically update stock assessment MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 reports for each marine mammal stock in U.S. waters.
Among other things, each report must include an estimate of stock abundance, mortality due to commercial fishing and other human-related factors, and a potential biological removal (PBR) level.
The latter is calculated using a formula designed to provide an estimate of the number of animals that could be removed from a stock each year, not including natural mortality, and still have assurance that the stock would increase toward or remain at its optimum sustainable population level.
For stocks listed as endangered or threatened under the Endangered Species Act, or whose incidental take levels exceed their calculated PBR level, the 1994 amendments require the Service to convene a take reduction team to prepare a recommended take reduction plan.
Take reduction teams are to include representatives of involved fisheries, environmental groups, marine mammal scientists, and government agencies.
Take reduction plans are required to include measures that will reduce incidental take levels to below the PBR level within six months of implementation and, further, to reduce bycatch to insignificant levels approaching zero by April 2001.
Pursuant to the amendments, the Service must circulate the teams' recommended plans, with any changes it believes necessary, for public review and then adopt a final plan promptly.
Because harbor porpoise incidental take levels were several times higher than the PBR level calculated from initial population surveys, the Service convened a Gulf of Maine Harbor Porpoise Take Reduction Team in February 1996 to develop a take reduction plan for New England gillnet fisheries.
Because information on fisheries and bycatch levels south of New England lagged behind that for the Gulf of Maine, the Service deferred efforts to develop mitigation measures for the mid-Atlantic region until February 1997 when it established a separate team to address gillnet fisheries between New York and North Carolina.
A Marine Mammal Commission representative has participated on the Gulf of Maine team since its inception in 1996 and, late in 2000, was also asked to join the mid-Atlantic team.
To explore new ways of preventing harbor porpoises from being caught in gillnets, the Service funded studies by New England gillnetters and scientists in 1994 and 1997 to test the effectiveness of 36 acoustic deterrent devices called pingers.
Pingers, the size of soda cans, are devices that emit intermittent sound pulses at frequencies audible to harbor porpoises.
The experiments demonstrated that, by attaching pingers to bridles between individual net panels, porpoise bycatch could be reduced by as much as 90 percent.
(Gillnets used in New England fisheries are usually composed of 10 or more net panels strung together with bridles.)
Based on the results of the experiment, the Gulf of Maine team developed take reduction measures for New England waters that focused on establishing two types of time-area fishing closures: (1) management areas in which all gillnet fishing would be prohibited in seasons of porpoise abundance, and (2) areas in which fishing would be prohibited seasonally except for fishing with pinger-equipped nets.
Despite their usefulness in reducing porpoise bycatch, pingers have several drawbacks.
At a cost of about $50 per pinger, the expense of outfitting gillnet vessels could exceed $30,000 depending on the number of nets fished.
Pingers on nets can hang up or snag, thus complicating the process of setting and retrieving nets.
Pingers also require periodic maintenance to replace batteries.
Also, pinger sounds may be audible to seals, which can learn to associate fish caught in nets with pinger sounds.
As a result, seals may be attracted to nets with pingers and take or damage caught fish.
Ensonification of fishing grounds by pingers also could cause harbor porpoises, and perhaps other cetaceans, to avoid habitat important to their survival.
Because of these and other concerns, the MidAtlantic Harbor Porpoise Take Reduction Team sought to develop a bycatch reduction strategy that did not involve pingers.
Data from initial observations of gillnet fisheries south of New England suggested that harbor porpoise bycatch rates differed between segments of the fishery depending on gear and fishing characteristics, such as twine diameter, mesh size, tie-downs (i.e., lines connecting float and lead lines to limit the vertical height of nets), soak time (i.e., the time nets are left in the water to fish),and the number and length of nets.
The midAtlantic team therefore developed take reduction measures that relied on establishing gear standards that had low harbor porpoise bycatch rates based on observer data.
As in New England, some time-area Chapter III Species of Special Concern fishing closures also were developed for the midAtlantic region.
The Gulf of Maine team submitted a recommended plan to the Service in August 1996 and the mid-Atlantic team did so in August 1997.
The Service was slow to act on the teams' submissions and, because of the Service's delays in meeting statutory timeframes for adopting a take reduction plan and taking certain other actions, the Humane Society of the United States filed a lawsuit against the Service in August 1998.
Among other things, the suit sought action by the Service to complete and adopt the plan, which it did in December 1998.
The Gulf of Maine Harbor Porpoise Take Reduction Plan implemented in December 1998 includes regulatory and nonregulatory measures for gillnet fisheries off both New England and the midAtlantic states.
The regulatory measures were implemented under authority of the Marine Mammal Protection Act.
For the New England area, six timearea management zones are established in which gillnet fishing is either completely prohibited or permitted only if gillnets are equipped with pingers (see Fig. 3).
Regulatory measures for waters between New York and North Carolina established three time-area management zones (see Fig 3) in which gillnet fishing is either closed seasonally or where deployed gillnets must conform with certain specified characteristics.
The mid-Atlantic closures contain no exceptions to allow fishing with pingers.
The regulations also set forth specific gear requirements (e.g., twine size, float line length, limits on the number and size of nets, and tie-downs) that must be used when and where fishing is allowed.
Other provisions in the Service's final plan included the following: a requirement that New England fishermen wishing to fish in closed areas with pingers receive training in pinger use and a certificate demonstrating that they have completed a training course; continuing the fishery observer program; conducting periodic porpoise abundance surveys; undertaking enforcement efforts; continuing to convene take reduction teams to recommend further action under the plan; and conducting other research, such as studies of the effects of pingers on harbor porpoise distribution and other components of the ecosystem.
37 In adopting its plan, the Service recognized that these measures alone would not be sufficient to reduce bycatch to below the calculated PBR level within six months, as required.
However, when added to other fishery closures being implemented at that time pursuant to recommendations by the New England Fishery Management Council to rebuild severely overfished groundfish stocks, the Service predicted that the combined effect would reduce porpoise bycatch to below the PBR level.
Throughout the 1990s, the Marine Mammal Commission and its Committee of Scientific Advisors has provided recommendations and assistance to the National Marine Fisheries Service to help evaluate the effectiveness of pingers and develop an effective take reduction program.
For a discussion of these efforts, see the Commission's previous annual reports.
Harbor Porpoise Management Actions in 1999 and 2000 Although take reduction measures for the New England and mid-Atlantic regions were merged into a single plan adopted in December 1998, the Service has decided to retain separate take reduction teams for the two regions.
This was done because of the different management approaches in each region and because the Service believed that a single team representing all the involved fisheries and areas would be too large to act effectively.
As noted in the previous annual report, the Service reconvened the Gulf of Maine team on 1415 December 1999 to consider further actions needed to reach the plan's established goals.
Although a final estimate of the 1999 harbor porpoise bycatch was not available at the time of the meeting, preliminary information suggested that bycatch levels had been reduced to levels approaching, if not below, the stock's PBR level.
At the same time the team met, however, the New England Fishery Management Council was considering possible changes to the New England groundfish closures that could result in increased harbor porpoise bycatch during the 2000 fishing seasons.
Because analyses of 1999 bycatch levels were not yet available to evaluate the extent to which 1999 fishery closures recommended by the Council had MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 38 Chapter III Species of Special Concern Figure 3.
(Opposite page) Time-area management zones under the Gulf of Maine Harbor Porpoise Take Reduction Plan (figure courtesy of Caroline Good, National Marine Fisheries Service). contributed to the reduced harbor porpoise bycatch, and also because the Council had not yet decided what changes to propose for 2000 to conserve groundfish, the team was unable to recommend changes to the harbor porpoise take reduction plan to compensate for any possible bycatch increase.
The team therefore recommended that the Service review any closure changes proposed by the Council to ensure that they would not inadvertently increase harbor porpoise bycatch levels in 2000.
The Council subsequently recommended an expansion of the system of closures for 2000 that was adopted by the Service and that was likely to further reduce harbor porpoise bycatch.
The Service also advised the Gulf of Maine team that it had developed hydrophones for use by the Coast Guard in enforcing pinger requirements at sea, but that they had not been used.
The Coast Guard apparently was unwilling to check deployed nets unless a Service enforcement agent was on board its vessel, and the Service was unwilling to assign its enforcement agents for this purpose.
As a result there was almost no at-sea enforcement of pinger requirements during 1999.
The team therefore recommended that the Service develop an enforcement plan in cooperation with the Coast Guard to ensure that pinger requirements were met.
The team also recommended that fishery observers randomly test pingers on nets to help assess the proportion of pingers not functioning properly, and that they also test pingers adjacent to any observed harbor porpoise takes to see if the pingers were working properly.
Some New England fishermen have reported increased levels of seal predation when using pingers, which emit sounds over a broad frequency range.
To examine ways of reducing such predation, the team recommended that the Service authorize experimental fishing with pingers that emit only high-frequency sounds (i.e., above 45 kHz), believed to be audible to porpoises but not to seals.
The Service reconvened the Mid-Atlantic Take Reduction Team on 1314 January 2000.
Final analyses of 1999 bycatch levels were not available 39 for that meeting either.
However, in view of preliminary information indicating that the bycatch level might be below the PBR level and a lack of new information on the effectiveness of adopted gear standards, the mid-Atlantic team recommended no changes to the regulations.
It did, however, recommend that waters in Delaware Bay be excluded from the regulations to be consistent with a similar exclusion in place for Chesapeake Bay and other inland waters.
The Service advised the team that some regional gillnetters had been refusing to take observers, even though required to do so.
The team therefore recommended that the Service take steps to increase compliance, including education programs to clarify statutory requirements.
Other team recommendations included steps to encourage gillnetters to pursue technological alternatives (e.g., pingers and reflective nets, see later in this section) to reduce harbor porpoise bycatch and to evaluate the extent to which harbor porpoises are caught by recreational gillnetters not covered under the plan.
After the meetings of the two teams, the Service completed analyses of the 1999 population survey and prepared a report presenting a new population estimate of 89,700 porpoises.
The Service also completed an estimate of 1999 bycatch levels.
Based on this new information, a draft revised Gulf of Maine harbor porpoise stock assessment report was prepared in November 2000, proposing a new PBR level of 757 porpoises a year.
After an opportunity for public review, the report is expected to be finalized in 2001.
Also during 2000 the Service continued its observer program in both the New England and mid-Atlantic regions and developed a preliminary analysis of bycatch levels for the first eight months of 2000. Service scientists also conducted an analysis of the effectiveness of measures in the harbor porpoise take reduction plan by comparing bycatch rates before plan implementation with those observed in 1999.
This analysis revealed that most of the reduction in bycatch during winter 1999 was attributable to a lack of fishing effort because of closures during the months of January through May in two areas off New England that previously had high bycatch levels: the mid-coast area (i.e., waters around an area called Jeffreys Ledge off the coasts of northern Massachusetts, New Hampshire, and MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 southern Maine) and Massachusetts Bay.
Although some of the closures in place in these areas between January and May were ones adopted by the Service at the recommendation of the New England Fishery Management Council to protect harbor porpoises, others were to protect groundfish stocks.
Even when these areas were open to fishing with nets equipped with pingers, there was very little fishing.
The analysis also found that all of the harbor porpoises caught in those two areas in 1999 occurred in the fall (i.e., during September and October) in nets equipped with pingers.
Comparing bycatch rates observed in the two areas over a six-year period before pingers were used (0.05 porpoise per haul) with rates observed in 1999 in nets equipped with pingers (0.03 porpoise per haul), the analysis revealed that bycatch levels declined by 40 percent --a much smaller reduction than the 90 percent reduction obtained in the 1994 and 1997 experiments.
During the Marine Mammal Commission's 1012 October 2000 annual meeting, representatives of the Service reported on these findings and the status of harbor porpoise take reduction efforts.
Based on that information, the Commission wrote to the Service on 17 November 2000.
The Commission noted that new information on the size of the Gulf of Maine harbor porpoise population and recent bycatch levels suggested that bycatch levels now pose less of a threat than was thought in the past.
However, the Commission noted that the New England Fishery Management Council would again be considering actions to reconfigure fishery closures that were not part of the harbor porpoise take reduction plan but that had contributed to recent reductions in harbor porpoise bycatch.
The Commission therefore recommended that the Service (1) estimate possible increases in harbor porpoise bycatch that might result from any changes proposed by the Council to fishery management plan provisions, and (2) concurrent with any action to adopt such changes, the Service adopt compensatory bycatch reduction measures under the harbor porpoise take reduction plan.
As a related matter, the Commission expressed its understanding that the take reduction teams would be reconvened soon to address the need for further reducing bycatch to insignificant levels approaching zero by the end of April 2001, as required by the Marine Mammal Protection Act.
40 As of the end of 2000 the Commission had not yet received a reply from the Service; however, late in 2000, the Service reconvened both take reduction teams to review new information and to consider further action.
The mid-Atlantic team met on 2830 November and the Gulf of Maine team met on 1213 December.
At both meetings, Service representatives reminded team members that 1994 amendments to the Marine Mammal Protection Act had directed that fishery-related bycatch of marine mammals be reduced to "insignificant levels approaching a zero mortality and serious injury rate" by the end of April 2001.
The Service has not yet determined how to define this standard; however, based on preliminary work on this issue, Service representatives advised the team that, for planning purposes, they should consider this goal to be satisfied if bycatch were reduced to a level of no more than 10 percent of the stock's PBR level (i.e., about 76 porpoises per year).
Both teams were provided preliminary results of tests using a new approach to reduce harbor porpoise bycatch--reflective netting.
Reflective nets are nylon nets filled with material (e.g., barium sulfate or iron oxide) that increases the reflection of acoustic signals to make them easier for harbor porpoises to detect.
The tests, conducted in 1998 and 2000 by Canadian gillnetters fishing for groundfish in the Bay of Fundy, were part of a collaborative effort between gear specialists who had developed the net, Canadian gillnetters, Canada's Department of Fisheries and Oceans, and the National Marine Fisheries Service.
Although the tests did not follow a strict scientific protocol, the results suggest that reflective nets could reduce harbor porpoise bycatch by as much as 80 percent, a level that approaches the reduction achieved with pingers during the 1994 and 1997 pinger experiments (i.e., a 90 percent decrease in bycatch rates).
From a combination of 1998 and 2000 data, 12 harbor porpoises were caught in 439 sets of conventional nets, but no harbor porpoises were caught in 231 sets of reflective nets.
Although groundfish catch rates in reflective nets were slightly lower than those in conventional nets, and the effectiveness of conventional nets in catching other species fished in U.S. waters had not yet been tested, both teams considered the results to be promising.
Believing that reflective nets could contribute greatly to achieving required take reduction goals without the Chapter III Species of Special Concern operational costs and difficulties associated with pingers, both teams drafted recommendations urging the Service to immediately sup-port a rigorous scientific experiment to test the effectiveness of reflective nets in catching fish and reducing harbor porpoise bycatch in U.S. waters.
At Gulf of Maine team meetings in both 1999 and 2000 members were advised that observer data documented a high proportion of illegal fishing in closed areas where fishing without pingers was prohibited.
On 22 percent of observed trips to areas where pingers were required, fishing nets had no pingers and on many other trips, nets had an inadequate number of pingers.
The team also was advised that there had been almost no at-sea enforcement of pinger requirements during the 2000 fishing seasons because the Service had not yet worked out arrangements with the Coast Guard to check for operating pingers at sea.
The Service also advised that it had not yet manufactured devices that observers could use to check whether pingers were functioning properly although it hoped to complete their manufacture soon.
Training in use of the new devices took place in December 2000 and they will be used by observers as soon as they become available.
This was the second year in a row in which there was almost no enforcement of pinger requirements at sea even though enforcement was a recognized need in the Service's adopted plan and the team had strongly recommended action to address this matter at its 1999 meeting.
Extremely disturbed by the Service's inability to address this aspect of the plan, the team again drafted a strong recommendation that the Service make at-sea enforcement a top priority, that it direct the resources and personnel necessary to develop an effective enforcement program in cooperation with the Coast Guard and state enforcement agencies, and that it report back to the team on the number of enforcement actions taken annually.
The team also drafted recommendations to increase penalties for noncompliance with take reduction plan regulations and to establish an annual certification requirement for any fishermen wishing to fish within areas where pingers are required.
The team also again recommended that the Service take steps to have observers check for functioning pingers on a random set of gillnets and adjacent to any caught harbor porpoises.
41 The Gulf of Maine team also drafted recommendations regarding the possible expansion of the closure areas south of Cape Cod and the preparation of a proposal by the Service for identifying key fishing closures now implemented under fishery management plans that contribute to achieving harbor porpoise take reduction goals and integrating them into the Harbor Porpoise Take Reduction Plan.
The latter action is needed to ensure that measures contributing to the maintenance of low harbor porpoise bycatch levels are not repealed when they are no longer needed to conserve fish stocks.
During the mid-Atlantic team's meeting, the Service noted that previous problems in getting gillnetters to take observers had diminished, but that, as in New England, there had been almost no at-sea enforcement.
The team therefore developed recommendations urging greater attention to enforcement.
Because no action had been taken on the team's 1999 recommendation to exempt waters in Delaware Bay from the regulations, the team again drafted a recommendation that the Service take action to do so.
As of the end of 2000 the two teams had not yet completed reports and final recommendations to the Service.
Chapter III Species of Special Concern operational costs and difficulties associated with pingers, both teams drafted recommendations urging the Service to immediately support a rigorous scientific experiment to test the effectiveness of reflective nets in catching fish and reducing harbor porpoise bycatch in U.S. waters.
At Gulf of Maine team meetings in both 1999 and 2000 members were advised that observer data documented a high proportion of illegal fishing in closed areas where fishing without pingers was prohibited.
On 22 percent of observed trips to areas where pingers were required, fishing nets had no pingers and on many other trips, nets had an inadequate number of pingers.
The team also was advised that there had been almost no at-sea enforcement of pinger requirements during the 2000 fishing seasons because the Service had not yet worked out arrangements with the Coast Guard to check for operating pingers at sea.
The Service also advised that it had not yet manufactured devices that observers could use to check whether pingers were functioning properly although it hoped to complete their manufacture soon.
Training in use of the new devices took place in December 2000 and they will be used by observers as soon as they become available.
This was the second year in a row in which there was almost no enforcement of pinger requirements at sea even though enforcement was a recognized need in the Service's adopted plan and the team had strongly recommended action to address this matter at its 1999 meeting.
Extremely disturbed by the Service's inability to address this aspect of the plan, the team again drafted a strong recommendation that the Service make at-sea enforcement a top priority, that it direct the resources and personnel necessary to develop an effective enforcement pro-gram in cooperation with the Coast Guard and state enforcement agencies, and that it report back to the team on the number of enforce-ment actions taken annually.
The team also drafted recommendations to increase penalties for non-compliance with take reduction plan regulations and to establish an annual certification requirement for any fishermen wishing to fish within areas where pingers are required.
The team also again recommended that the Service take steps to have observers check for functioning pingers on a random set of gillnets and adjacent to any caught harbor porpoises.
41 The Gulf of Maine team also drafted recommendations regarding the possible expansion of the closure areas south of Cape Cod and the preparation of a proposal by the Service for identifying key fishing closures now implemented under fishery management plans that contribute to achieving harbor porpoise take reduction goals and integrating them into the Harbor Porpoise Take Reduction Plan.
The latter action is needed to ensure that measures contributing to the maintenance of low harbor porpoise bycatch levels are not repealed when they are no longer needed to conserve fish stocks.
During the mid-Atlantic team's meeting, the Service noted that previous problems in getting gillnetters to take observers had diminished, but that, as in New England, there had been almost no at-sea enforcement.
The team therefore developed recommendations urging greater attention to enforcement.
Because no action had been taken on the team's 1999 recommendation to exempt waters in Delaware Bay from the regulations, the team again drafted a recommendation that the Service take action to do so.
As of the end of 2000 the two teams had not yet completed reports and final recommendations to the Service.
Bottlenose Dolphin (Tursiops truncatus) Bottlenose dolphins are distributed in coastal waters throughout the world's temperate and tropical regions.
In some areas, they also occur offshore over deeper pelagic waters.
They are the most common cetacean along the U.S. southeastern and Gulf of Mexico coasts and, together with other species such as manatees and right whales, may be significantly affected by pollution, fisheries, oil and gas development, and other human activities.
Bottlenose dolphins are the most common cetacean maintained in captivity for public display and scientific research.
At its 1012 October 2000 annual meeting in St. Petersburg, Florida, the Commission devoted particular attention to research and management issues pertaining to bottlenose dolphins in the waters off the southeastern United States, including coastal areas of both the Atlantic Ocean and the Gulf of Mexico.
Although MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 putative stocks of bottlenose dolphins in these areas appear to be in better shape than some other marine mammal subspecies or species (e.g., Hawaiian monk seal, California sea otter, northern right whale, Florida manatee), the conservation of bottlenose dolphins also requires attention.
Coastal dolphins are exposed to a variety of human-associated risks, such as commercial fishing, offshore oil and gas development, and recreational activities.
Dolphin stocks have been affected by several major die-offs in the southeastern United States, and the effects of those die-offs, either alone or in concert with other mortality factors, remain unclear.
The coastal migratory stock of dolphins has been designated as depleted, but neither a conservation plan nor a take reduction plan has been adopted to direct recovery efforts.
Last, bottlenose dolphins may be a good indicator species for studying the levels and effects of environmental toxins.
For these reasons, the Commission examined a number of issues related to bottlenose dolphins at its meeting.
Among other things, the Commission examined (1) research related to identification of stock structure, (2) research on other topics, including the effects of human activities on dolphins and their environment, (3) development of commercial ventures offering inadvisable or illegal interactions with wild dolphins, (4) inadequate or ineffective enforcement of regulations pertaining to such activities, and (5) the development of a long-awaited conservation plan and appointment of a take reduction team.
During the meeting, scientists and managers with the National Marine Fisheries Service reviewed recent research findings and future research and management plans.
Bottlenose Dolphin Research Needs Determination of stock structure is one of the most pressing needs for research and management of bottlenose dolphins off the U.S. Atlantic and Gulf of Mexico coasts.
Although stock structure is poorly understood at present, such information is essential to assess stock abundance, trends, and interactions with fisheries or other human activities.
Along the U.S. Atlantic and Gulf coasts in the last 15 years, at least five unusual mortality events have occurred, the largest of which involved more than 700 dolphins stranded on beaches from New Jersey to Florida.
Lacking suf- ficient information on stock structure, managers and scientists cannot determine the number of stocks affected, the nature and severity of impacts to each stock, or the time required for each stock to recover to a healthy state.
Considerable numbers of bottlenose dolphins also are killed incidentally in commercial fisheries, and the impact of such incidental killing is difficult to assess without sufficient information on stock structure.
Such information is also necessary for assessment of the potential impacts of oil and gas development in the marine environment, recreational boating, or other human activities that may adversely affect these stocks and their essential habitat.
On 18 December 1998 the Commission wrote to the National Marine Fisheries Service about the importance of assessing stock structure.
In its letter the Commission noted that several reasonably discrete population stocks may occur in U.S. Gulf and Atlantic waters: (1) a nearshore east coast population that migrates annually between summering areas north of Cape Hatteras, North Carolina, and wintering areas off Georgia and northern Florida; (2) year-round resident populations in places such as Sarasota Bay; (3) populations that occur in deep waters off both the Atlantic and Gulf states; and (4) intermixing resident and migratory populations that overlap seasonally in places such as the Indian and Banana Rivers in eastcentral Florida.
Nevertheless, considerable uncertainty exists about stock structure, including the putative coastal migratory stock that was declared depleted following the 19871988 die-off along the Atlantic coast.
Important questions remain about the number, location, and size of resident stocks, the number of migratory stocks, and the degree to which migratory and resident stocks intermix.
Therefore, in its 18 December 1998 letter to the Service, the Commission reiterated a recommendation resulting from a December 1996 program review at the Southeast Fisheries Science Center that the Service identify and initiate long-term longitudinal studies using mark/resight methods or radiotelemetry technology to determine the geographic distribution and discreteness of possibly separate populations.
Research plans developed by the Service's Southeast Fisheries Science Center in the late 1970s and early 1980s had called for establishing long-term mark/ 42 Chapter III Species of Special Concern resighting programs in Sarasota Bay, Mississippi Sound, and the Indian and Banana Rivers.
Pilot studies were initiated in each of these areas, but only the Sarasota Bay program was continued.
To investigate stock structure, the Service established in 1997 a coordinated research program using genetics, photo-identification, and telemetry.
Initial work has focused along the Atlantic coast because this region includes the coastal migratory stock designated as depleted and because of high levels of incidental take documented in gillnet fisheries in the area.
Although multiple stocks have been identified, additional studies of stock structure, abundance, degree of mixing, and seasonal movements are needed.
Such work also is needed in the Gulf of Mexico, where stock structure is even less clear and the Service recognizes about three dozen separate stocks of bottlenose dolphins.
This large number of stocks creates a significant management challenge.
In March 2000 the Service hosted a meeting in Sarasota, Florida, to discuss the most efficient ways to resolve questions about the species' stock structure in the Gulf.
A brief report of that meeting was provided to the Commission at its annual meeting.
Service personnel indicated that funds would be sought to begin a comprehensive research program similar to that now under way along the Atlantic coast.
In a 12 December 2000 letter to the National Marine Fisheries Service, the Commission agreed that comprehensive studies along the Atlantic coast provided a good framework for future dolphin research in the Gulf of Mexico.
The Commission commended the Service for its efforts in this regard and urged it to expedite funding for such research.
Several small to moderate dolphin mortality events have occurred in the Gulf over the past decade, including one in the Florida panhandle in 2000 (see Chapter VII).
Suspected causes of these events have varied and include red tides, morbillivirus, and exposure to cold weather.
Dolphins in at least some parts of the Gulf may also be especially vulnerable to disease or environmental stresses because of exposure to high levels of anthropogenic toxins.
Other human activities that affect dolphins in the Gulf to at least some extent are commercial and recreational fishing, oil and gas development, high levels of boat traffic, and underwater noise.
Further, environmental con-ditions in the Gulf appear to be declining, as suggested by an 43 extensive "dead zone" in the western Gulf and ecological problems associated with eutrophication due to runoff from agricultural areas.
In its 18 December 1998 letter to the Service (discussed earlier), the Commission recommended that the Service consult with the Environmental Protection Agency, the Minerals Management Service, and relevant coastal state agencies to determine whether everything necessary was being done to assess the sources, levels, and effects of anthropogenic contaminants present in bottlenose dolphins in waters off the U.S. Atlantic and Gulf states.
In its 12 December 2000 letter to the Service, the Commission recommended that the Service initiate carefully controlled experiments and testing to clarify the effects of anthropogenic toxins on individual dolphins and on dolphin populations.
The Commission noted that both the report of the October 1998 workshop on marine mammals and persistent ocean contaminants (see Appendix B) and a 1998 report from the International Whaling Commission's Scientific Committee have recommended a multifaceted research approach (combining behavioral observations, life history research, ecological assessment, health monitoring, and toxicology) using index populations of marine mammals, including bottlenose dolphins.
As of the end of 2000 the Service has indicated that funding will be made available during 2001 for studies of the effects of toxins on the Sarasota Bay dolphin population.
Bottlenose Dolphins and Tourism In recent years, commercial ventures that encourage close and sometimes illegal interactions between humans and dolphins have proliferated in the southeastern United States (also discussed in Chapter IX).
These ventures offer members of the public a variety of experiences from dolphin watching to swimming with wild dolphins.
In some cases, such activities have been interpreted to constitute harassment, whereas in others the legal status is less clear.
The feeding of freeranging dolphins, an activity explicitly prohibited under established regulations, also has occurred and persisted in various locations.
To document the extent, nature, and effects of such activities, the Commission contracted for a study to (1) review the literature on the topic of humandolphin interactions, and (2) quantify and describe the MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 development of swim-with-the-dolphin programs in the Florida panhandle.
The study was completed in April 2000 and is available from the Commission (see Appendix B).
The study divided dolphins into four behavioral types: (1) solitary but sociable with humans, (2) food-provisioned, (3) habituated to humans, and (4) not habituated to humans.
Although the report acknowledged a lack of information about the effects of human-dolphin interactions, it concluded that (1) dolphins are vulnerable to injury and death as a result of human contact; (2) animals appearing tolerant of or even seeking such contact have already been placed at risk by extensive habituation achieved through considerable human effort; (3) such contact can disrupt important natural behaviors of wild dolphins; and (4) a precautionary approach is necessary to ensure the protection of wild dolphins from the adverse effects of human-dolphin interactions.
At the Commission's 2000 annual meeting, representatives of the Service reviewed the status of such activities in the southeastern United States and expressed grave concern about the individual and cumulative effects of close interactions between humans and dolphins.
They advised the Commission that new draft regulations to address these interactions would soon be circulated to the Commission and other agencies for comment.
In its 12 December 2000 letter to the Service, the Commission commended such efforts and urged haste in adopting clear, rational regulations and guidelines.
The Commission also urged the Service to consult with other involved agencies (e.g., the Fish and Wildlife Service and the public display industry) to assure that a consistent message reach the public.
In this regard, the Commission noted that patrons of public display facilities offering swim-with-the-dolphin or dolphin-feeding exhibits may be confused about what constitutes appropriate behavior with marine mammals in the wild, and that regulations developed by the Service should be consistent with those promulgated by the Fish and Wildlife Service for species under its charge.
other marine life.
They noted that enforcement has been compromised by an inadequate number of enforcement officers, the extensive coastline to be covered, and the large number of competing, highpriority demands requiring attention (e.g., investigation of interactions between shrimp fisheries and turtles).
In its 12 December 2000 letter to the Service, the Commission strongly recommended that enforcement staffing and efforts be increased significantly, not only for bottlenose dolphins, but also for other species for which the Service is responsible.
The letter noted that the Commission also had urged the Fish and Wildlife Service and the Florida Division of Law Enforcement to increase their enforcement capabilities.
Finally, the letter recommended that the Service should seek to develop a coordinated enforcement strategy involving all three agencies in Florida.
A reply had not been received as of 31 December 2000.
Conservation Plan and Take Reduction Team As described in previous annual reports, the Commission has repeatedly recommended that the National Marine Fisheries Service develop and implement a bottlenose dolphin conservation plan.
During the Commission's November 1998 annual meeting in Portland, Maine, representatives of the Service advised the Commission that it had contracted with three scientists to prepare a conservation plan for bottlenose dolphins.
The Commission understood that a draft conservation plan would be completed and circulated for comment during the first half of 1999.
At the end of 1999 the Commission was advised that a draft conservation plan had been completed and forwarded to the Southeast Fisheries Science Center for con-sideration.
The plan has not yet been circulated for review outside the Service and, at the Commission's October 2000 annual meeting, the Service stated that the draft plan would soon be distributed to the Commission and other agencies for comments.
The Commission's 12 December letter again urged the Service to move forward expeditiously to complete and adopt a bottlenose dolphin conservation plan.
At the end of December 2000 the Commission had not received the draft plan.
Finally, at the Commission's 2000 annual meeting, the Service stated that it would soon form a take reduction team to address the issue of incidental taking 44 Enforcement At the Commission's 2000 annual meeting, representatives of the Service discussed problems relating to inadequate and ineffective enforcement of regulations intended to protect bottlenose dolphins and Chapter III Species of Special Concern of bottlenose dolphins in commercial fisheries in midAtlantic states.
A take reduction team would complement the conservation plan described earlier and provide important guidance to managers and conservationists.
In its 12 December 2000 letter to the Service, the Commission encouraged the Service to move forward rapidly with the creation of this team and indicated that the Commission would be pleased to participate on the team or otherwise assist.
A bottlenose dolphin take reduction team had not been appointed as of 31 December 2000.
Cook Inlet Beluga Whale (Delphinapterus leucas) Beluga whales are found in seasonally ice-covered waters throughout Arctic and subArctic regions.
With the exception of those in the northern Gulf of Alaska, most beluga whales in U.S. waters are thought to winter in the Bering Sea in open leads and polynyas in the pack ice.
In spring and summer, they are found in warmer coastal areas or the offshore pack ice.
For management purposes, five stocks are recognized in U.S. waters.
The distinction is based on the stocks' discontinuous su mmer d i stribution and on mitochondrial DNA analyses that indicate clear genetic differences among animals using different summering areas.
The five stocks are named after their primary summering areas, which are located in Cook Inlet, Bristol Bay, the eastern Bering Sea, the eastern Chukchi Sea, and the Beaufort Sea.
The most isolated population of beluga whales in U.S. waters is found in Cook Inlet and is separated from the other four summer populations by the Alaska Peninsula.
Because of their proximity to Anchorage, beluga whales in Cook Inlet are exposed to the largest urban coastal area in Alaska.
Analyses by the National Marine Fisheries Service of beluga whale sightings in Cook Inlet over the past 30 years indicate that the stock's summer range has contracted in recent years.
Compared with sightings in the 1970s and 1980s, animals now are rarely seen in offshore waters or the lower reaches of the inlet.
During midsummer, the stock is concentrated in a few groups in the upper reaches of the inlet around river mouths.
Their distribution becomes more dispersed as winter approaches.
45 Aerial surveys of beluga whales in Cook Inlet have been conducted by the National Marine Fisheries Service annually in June or July since 1994.
Data from those surveys indicate that the Cook Inlet beluga whale population declined from an estimated 653 (CV = 0.43) individuals in 1994 to 347 (CV = 0.29) in 1998.
This constitutes about a 47 percent decline in just four years.
The 1999 surveys yielded an abundance estimate of 357 (CV = 0.20), somewhat higher, but not significantly different than the 1998 estimate.
The 2000 surveys produced the lowest index count (184 whales) since systematic surveys began.
However, when corrected to account for missed whales and when combined with the results of a second survey, also conducted in June, the 2000 estimate was 435 whales.
The coefficient of variation around this estimate (0.23) again was rather large, owing in large part to the significant variation between results from surveys on two different days.
It is likely that the increase in the abundance estimate for the stock between 1999 and 2000 is the result of interannual variation in the counts, rather than substantial growth in the population.
Stock Assessment Under the Marine Mammal Protection Act, the National Marine Fisheries Service is required to prepare a stock assessment for each marine mammal stock under its jurisdiction that occurs in U.S. waters.
Among other things, each assessment is to include an estimate of the stock's potential biological removal level.
This calculation is based on the stock's estimated minimum population size, its maximum net productivity rate and a recovery factor ranging from 0.1 to 1.0, depending on the status of the stock.
The potential biological removal level is the maximum number of animals, not including natural mortalities, that can be removed from the stock while providing reasonable assurance that it will recover to or remain within its optimum sustainable population level.
The potential biological removal level calculated for the Cook Inlet population of beluga whales in the 1998 stock assessment, which used a recovery factor of 1.0, was 14 animals.
The Alaska Regional Scientific Review Group, appointed by the Service to provide advice on the status of Alaska marine mammal stocks, met in late 1998 to evaluate information on the Cook Inlet beluga whale MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 stock.
The group recommended that the Service use the 1998 population size point estimate of 347 animals and, to reflect the depleted status of the stock, a recovery factor of 0.5 when making future potential biological removal calculations.
The group met again in April 1999 to further evaluate available Cook Inlet beluga whale population data and concluded that it should be considered a "high risk" stock because of its low abundance, declining trend, limited range, and susceptibility to catastrophic events.
As a result, the Alaska Regional Scientific Review Group recommended that the National Marine Fisheries Service use a recovery factor of 0.1 when calculating the potential biological removal level for this stock.
Despite this advice, the 1999 stock assessment report for Cook Inlet beluga whales used a recovery factor of 0.5.
This resulted in a revised potential biological removal level of 2.7 whales per year.
In the draft stock assessment for 2000, the Service again did not adopt the 0.1 recovery factor recommended by the Scientific Review Group.
Rather, recognizing that the stock had been proposed to be designated as depleted under the Marine Mammal Protection Act and considering the Service's pending review of two petitions to list the stock as endangered under the Endangered Species Act, the Service lowered the recovery factor to 0.3.
Using this value and the minimum population estimate of 303 for 1999, the Service calculated a potential biological removal level of 1.8 whales for this stock.
Native Subsistence Harvest Section 101(b) of the Marine Mammal Protection Act allows Alaska Natives to take marine mammals for subsistence or handicraft purposes provided the taking is not done in a wasteful manner.
Only if a stock has been determined to be depleted or has been listed as endangered or threatened may any other limits be placed on such taking.
The estimated subsistence harvest of Cook Inlet beluga whales averaged about 15 animals per year between 1990 and 1994 according to figures derived from a variety of sources and provided by the Alaska Beluga Whale Committee, a group made up of Alaska Native beluga whale hunters and biologists.
However, this figure almost certainly underestimates the take because it does not take into account all animals that 46 were struck and lost and may not include beluga whales taken from the Cook Inlet stock by Native hunters who reside outside the Cook Inlet region.
The Cook Inlet Marine Mammal Council, a Native group formed in 1992, estimated that more than 30 whales were taken annually by subsistence hunters in Cook Inlet from 1990 through 1994.
The most thorough surveys of beluga whale subsistence harvests in Cook Inlet were undertaken in 1995 and 1996 by the Cook Inlet Marine Mammal Council.
The Council reported that 72 whales were taken in 1995, including 22 that were struck and lost.
The kill in 1996 was estimated to be 98 to 147 whales, including an estimated 49 to 98 whales struck and lost.
In 1997, 70 whales were estimated to have been taken, of which an estimated 35 were struck and lost.
The National Marine Fisheries Service estimates that 42 whales were taken in 1998 although other information, including an unverified report of 20 whales taken during one weekend in June by hunters from outside the Cook Inlet region, suggests that the actual number may have been much larger.
As discussed below, no beluga whales were reported to have been taken during the 1999 and 2000 hunting seasons.
The imprecision of the estimates of the level of subsistence taking prompted the Commission and others to recommend that the National Marine Fisheries Service adopt marking and tagging regulations, as provided for by section 109(i) of the Marine Mammal Protection Act.
As noted in the previous annual report, the Service promulgated such regulations in 1999, requiring Alaska Native hunters to report each Cook Inlet beluga whale landed and to present the lower left jawbone of the whale for marking.
Since establishment of the reporting and marking requirements, however, no landing of a beluga whale subject to the regulations has been reported.
Management Issues Beluga whale muktuk has been sold through commercial outlets in Anchorage under the provision of section 101(b) of the Marine Mammal Protection Act that allows edible portions of marine mammals taken by Alaska Natives for subsistence purposes or for the creation of authentic Native handicrafts to be sold in Native villages and towns.
Under the National Marine Fisheries Service's interpretation of the Marine Chapter III Species of Special Concern Mammal Protection Act, Anchorage is considered to be a Native village.
Muktuk is the skin and blubber from the whale and is a popular Native food.
Because of the demand for muktuk, beluga whales taken near Anchorage have a significant cash value.
Before 1999 some hunters reportedly took large numbers of beluga whales for the muktuk, which they sold privately or at Native food stores in Anchorage.
Before the 1999 beluga whale hunting season, there was no effective mechanism for establishing limits on the Native subsistence take from the Cook Inlet stock.
The National Marine Fisheries Service had worked with Alaska Natives, particularly the Cook Inlet Marine Mammal Council, to develop a comanagement agreement under section 119 of the Marine Mammal Protection Act, which, among other things, would have established mutually acceptable harvest limits for the Cook Inlet stock.
However, a number of contributing factors made setting such harvest limits particularly difficult.
Cook Inlet is a large area that includes many communities.
The Alaska Native population that hunts whales from this stock includes individuals from local villages as well as people who move into the region from elsewhere in Alaska.
Beluga whale hunters who have moved into the area from elsewhere may not be members of local tribes and consequently may not be members of the Cook Inlet Marine Mammal Council or other tribally authorized groups.
As such, they likely would not be subject to any co-management agreement entered into by the Council or a tribal group.
Cook Inlet beluga whales also may be hunted legally by Alaska Natives living in other parts of the state, who likewise would probably not be covered by any co-management agreement.
Ultimately, the greatest impediment to effective co-management lies in the inability of the parties to enforce the provisions of an agreement.
Although amendments to the Marine Mammal Protection Act enacted in 1994 provide explicitly for co-management agreements, they do not, as currently interpreted by the National Marine Fisheries Service, convey additional authority to the Service or Native organizations to enforce such agreements.
Thus, despite agreement by the Service, the Alaska Beluga Whale Committee, and the Cook Inlet Marine Mammal Council that the commercial sale of beluga whales should be prohibited 47 and hunting curtailed, by the end of 1998 it was apparent that additional measures were needed.
Designating the stock as depleted under the Marine Mammal Protection Act or listing it as threatened or endangered under the Endangered Species Act would enable the Service to regulate the harvest, provided that certain findings were made.
Alternatively, new legislation would be needed to authorize harvest regulation.
Beluga Whale Status Review Concern over the small and decreasing number of beluga whales in Cook Inlet and the apparent overharvesting prompted the Service to publish in the 19 November 1998 Federal Register a notice of intent to review the status of Cook Inlet beluga whales.
The purpose of the review was to determine whether the Cook Inlet stock warranted designation as depleted under the Marine Mammal Protection Act or listing as endangered or threatened under the Endangered Species Act.
The review was also intended to elicit information on the stock's distribution, abundance, population dynamics, food habits, and health, as well as the effects of the Native subsistence harvest and other anthropogenic impacts on the population.
As discussed in the previous annual report, the Commission provided comments to the Service on 22 January 1999.
The Commission noted that the unsustainable harvest by Alaska Natives was a major factor in the decline of the population and further noted that the preferred approach for addressing the overharvest should be a cooperative one in which the Native community and the Service share responsibility for conserving the Cook Inlet beluga whale population.
The Commission recommended that the Service also pursue other alternatives should it prove impossible to implement an enforceable co-management regime that would effectively limit the number of Cook Inlet beluga whales that could be taken.
These included adoption of regulations to restrict the harvest or enactment of legislation to impose such limits.
In light of the drastic decline of the Cook Inlet beluga population and the continuing threat of overharvest, the Commission believed that the population warranted protection under the Endangered Species Act and recommended that the Service use emergency procedures to list the stock as endangered or threatened.
Because such a listing would be effective for MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 only 240 days, the Commission recommended that the Service promptly publish a proposed rule to list the stock under normal procedures on a permanent basis.
The prohibitions on taking that apply to endangered or threatened species by virtue of listing cannot, by themselves, limit harvest levels as long as the whales are taken by Alaska Natives for subsistence purposes and the take is not done in a wasteful manner.
Therefore, the Commission further recommended that the Service initiate rulemaking under section 10(e) of the Endangered Species Act and/or section 101(b) of the Marine Mammal Protection Act to limit the allowable Native take from the Cook Inlet beluga whale population.
Acknowledging that there may be impediments preventing the Service from quickly establishing regulatory limits on the Native harvest, the Commission noted that, as a more timely alternative, the Service should pursue a legislative solution that would provide the necessary level of protection to this stock, at least on an interim basis.
This latter approach ultimately was followed with enactment on 21 May 1999 of section 3022 of Public Law 106-31, the 1999 Emergency Supplemental Appropriations Act.
The provision, enacted as a freestanding amendment, specified that, until 1 October 2000, the taking of a beluga whale from the Cook Inlet stock would be lawful only if it occurred pursuant to a cooperative agreement between the Service and Alaska Native organizations.
It was believed that, by allowing the Service to limit the taking of Cook Inlet beluga whales for the next 16 months, there would be sufficient time for the agency either (1) to conclude a comprehensive co-management agreement with Native hunters or (2) to list the stock as endangered or threatened under the Endangered Species Act or as depleted under the Marine Mammal Protection Act and complete a rulemaking to restrict the hunt.
Proposal to List Beluga Whales as Depleted As part of its status review of the Cook Inlet beluga whale, the National Marine Fisheries Service held a workshop in March 1999.
The review confirmed that Cook Inlet beluga whales are geographically and genetically isolated from other beluga whale stocks; that the stock's abundance had declined by nearly 50 percent between 1994 and 1998; that the population had declined to an estimated 347 whales; and that the 48 potential biological removal level established for this stock should be no more than three whales.
The Service provided a draft report based on results of the scientific review to the Commission early in July 1999, seeking the Commission's concurrence that designation of the stock as depleted under the Marine Mammal Protection Act was warranted.
The Commission responded on 23 July 1999, recom-mending that the Service promptly complete and publish a proposed rule under section 115(a) of the Marine Mammal Protection Act to designate the Cook Inlet beluga whale population as depleted or, alter-natively, publish a proposed rule to list the population as threatened or endangered under the Endangered Species Act.
On 19 October 1999 the Service pub-lished a proposed rule in the Federal Register to desig-nate the Cook Inlet beluga whale stock as depleted.
On 21 December 1999 the Commission provided comments on the proposed rule and on related information on the Cook Inlet beluga whale stock received during the Commission's 1999 annual meeting.
Although the threat of overharvesting by Alaska Natives for subsistence and related commercial purposes had been eased in the short term by the statutory provision enacted in May 1999, the Commission noted that there was no adequate mechanism in place to govern the Cook Inlet beluga whale harvest after 1 October 2000 when the amendment would cease to have effect.
In its letter of 21 December 1999 the Commission identified three approaches available to the Service to ensure that beluga whale harvests in Cook Inlet would not exceed sustainable levels after the amendment lapsed.
They were (1) concluding a cooperative management agreement or series of agreements covering all Native hunters that hunt belugas in the Cook Inlet area that would ensure that sustainable harvest levels are not exceeded; (2) promulgating regulations under section 101(b) of the Marine Mammal Protection Act to impose limits on the numbers of Cook Inlet beluga whales that could be taken for subsistence purposes; and (3) securing a longterm legislative solution to prevent overharvesting and allow the stock to recover to its optimum sustainable population level.
The Commission suggested that the Service pursue all three alternatives.
In addition, the Commission recommended that the Service (1) publish a final depletion finding as quickly as possible; (2) give Chapter III Species of Special Concern high priority to ensuring that an adequate management mechanism is in place by 1 October 2000 to govern the harvest; (3) apprise Congress of the current situation regarding Cook Inlet beluga whales, actions being taken by the Service and others to address the situation, and the possible need for additional remedial legislation; and (4) publish a proposed rule to list the Cook Inlet beluga whale stock as either endangered or threatened under the Endangered Species Act.
The Service responded on 4 April 2000, indicating that it was working with a variety of groups to halt the decline and promote the recovery of the stock.
It noted that the results of the 1999 survey of Cook Inlet beluga whales had produced an abundance estimate similar to that for 1998, suggesting that limiting the harvest may be sufficient to reverse recent declines.
The Service also highlighted several actions under way to conserve the stock.
These included plans to publish a final rule on a depletion finding promptly after the close of the comment period, background work in anticipation of adopting regulations limiting Native taking by 1 October 2000, and efforts to develop an effective comanagement ag reemen t with Alaska Native organizations.
The Service also advised that it planned to brief Congress on the status of the population in anticipation of the possible need for an extension of the applicable provision of Public Law 106-31, that it would publish a finding with respect to listing the stock under the Endangered Species Act, and that an environmental impact statement would be prepared to evaluate the factors that may be affecting the beluga stock and identify available recovery actions.
As recommended by the Commission and the vast majority of the 800 people and organizations that submitted comments on the proposed depletion rule, the National Marine Fisheries Service published a final rule in the Federal Register on 31 May 2000 desig-nating the Cook Inlet stock of beluga whales as depleted under the Marine Mammal Protection Act.
In taking this action, as it has with other cetacean species, the Service specified that it considered 60 percent of carrying capacity to be the stock's maximum net productivity level (the lower bound of the optimum sustainable population range for the stock).
That is, if the stock had declined to less than 60 percent of its carrying capacity, it would be considered depleted.
In this case, a reliable estimate of carrying capacity (i.e., historical 49 abundance before the decline) was not available.
Based on the limited surveys that had been conducted before 1994, when the Service instituted its current survey program, and anecdotal information provided by experienced Alaska Native hunters living in the Cook Inlet area, the Service believed that the historical abundance of the beluga whale population in that area exceeded 1,000 animals.
If carrying capacity were greater than 1,000 beluga whales, the stock clearly would be depleted.
Even if one were to use the abundance estimate from the 1994 survey as the best indication of carrying capacity, the statistical analyses performed by the Service indicated that there was a 71 percent probability that the stock had declined by 40 percent between 1994 and 1998.
Inasmuch as the Cook Inlet stock of beluga whales had been hunted for subsistence throughout the 1980s and early 1990s and likely had already been significantly reduced by 1994, the Service believed that there was strong evidence to conclude that the stock was below its optimum sustainable population and therefore depleted.
Proposal to List Beluga Whales as Endangered As noted above, the Commission, beginning in January 1999, has recommended that the Cook Inlet beluga whale stock also be listed under the Endangered Species Act.
In this regard, two petitions seeking to have the stock listed as endangered were submitted to the National Marine Fisheries Service in March 1999.
On 9 April 1999 the Service published a notice announcing their receipt along with a finding that each of the petitions presented substantial information indicating that listing may be warranted.
Under the Endangered Species Act, the Service is to make a finding within 12 months of receiving a listing petition as to whether listing is warranted or not.
When the Service failed to meet that deadline, one of the groups of petitioners filed suit in U.S. district court on 8 May 2000 (Cook Inlet Beluga Whale et al. v. Daley), seeking to compel issuance of the required finding.
The Service published a notice of determination on 22 June 2000, finding that listing under the Endangered Species Act was not warranted at that time.
The Service reviewed possible threats to the population, including fishery interactions; oil spills and contact with other pollutants and contaminants; killer whale predation; disturbance from oil and gas explor- MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 ation and development, shipping, airport operations, and other human activities; and prey depletion, and concluded that, with the exception of taking by subsistence hunters, none of these factors was likely having an adverse impact on the stock.
As for subsistence hunting, the Service concluded that the problem was being addressed sufficiently by limitations imposed by Public Law 106-31 and by regulations that the Service planned to propose pursuant to the depletion designation under the Marine Mammal Protection Act.
Thus, it believed that the stock was no longer in danger of extinction or likely to become so in the foreseeable future.
As for the possible threat posed by the population having been reduced to a small size, an analysis prepared by Service scientists concluded that a stock with at least 300 individuals and a positive intrinsic growth rate was unlikely to go extinct due to stochastic events.
Dissatisfied with the Service's reasoning, plaintiffs in the aforementioned lawsuit amended their complaint in September 2000 to challenge the Service's decision not to proceed with a listing proposal.
They contended that the Service had acted arbitrarily and capriciously in finding that listing was not warranted and that it had failed to use the best available scientific and commercial data in making its decision, as required under the Endangered Species Act.
In response to that challenge, the City of Anchorage, the Kenai Peninsula Borough, the Matanuska-Susitna Borough, the Alaska Oil and Gas Association, and the Resource Development Council for Alaska all filed to intervene in the case, claiming that their interests would be adversely affected if the Service's decision not to list the Cook Inlet stock of beluga whales was set aside.
As of the end of 2000 the court had yet to rule on the motions to intervene.
whale stock, the Service entered into a co-management agreement with the Cook Inlet Marine Mammal Council on 3 June 2000.
Under that agreement, the parties agreed to authorize one strike of a beluga whale during 2000, with that strike allocated to the Native village of Tyonek.
The agreement also included specific provisions under which the hunt would be conducted to increase the likelihood that the whale would be successfully landed, minimize the impact on the beluga whale population, and prevent commercial use of the whale's parts.
Although Tyonek was allowed to take one whale during 2000, the authorized strike was not used.
Regulation of Native Harvest Section 101(b) of the Marine Mammal Protection Act provides authority for the Service to regulate the taking of depleted species of marine mammals by Alaska Natives when necessary for the conservation of the affected species or stock.
Such regulations, however, may only be prescribed through formal rulemaking, which affords affected Natives and other interested parties the opportunity for a hearing on the record, at which an administrative law judge develops the record of the proceeding and provides a recommended decision to the agency.
Section 103(d) of the Act sets forth the rulemaking procedures and the information that must be published by the agency prior to, or concurrent with, the publication of a proposed rule.
Among other things, the agency is to publish and make available to the public any recommendations provided to the Service by the Marine Mammal Commission that relate to the regulations.
In anticipation of publishing a proposed rule to regulate the Cook Inlet beluga whale hunt, and to satisfy the consultation requirement of section 103(a) of the Marine Mammal Protection Act, the Service wrote to the Commission on 10 July 2000.
The Service provided a partial draft proposed rule and solicited any additional Commission advice before publication.
The Commission responded by letter of 31 July 2000.
In general, the Commission strongly supported the proposal to establish harvest limitations, concluding that such an action was essential to conserve the depleted beluga whale stock.
The Com-mission believed, however, that certain aspects of the draft rule needed to be strengthened or clarified.
In this regard, 50 Co-Management Agreement for 2000 As noted earlier, enactment of Public Law 106-31 prohibited until 1 October 2000 any taking of a Cook Inlet beluga whale by Alaska Natives unless authorized by a cooperative agreement between the National Marine Fisheries Service and an Alaska Native organization.
In an effort to provide an opportunity for Natives in the Cook Inlet area to meet their subsistence needs and to continue their hunting customs, traditions, and culture, while promoting the recovery of the beluga Chapter III Species of Special Concern the Commission recommended that a provision be added to define the geographic area to which the regulations would apply.
The Commission also suggested that the Service specify the particulars of the harvest regime more completely, rather than deferring most elements until the adoption of a cooperative agreement after regulations are in place.
The Commission further recommended that the Service consider revising a proposed prohibition on the sale of parts and edible portions from Cook Inlet beluga whales to prohibit other quasi-commercial transactions, such as barter, and address the sale of meat from other beluga whale stocks, which, if not also regulated, could create enforcement difficulties.
The Commission supported the proposal to prohibit the taking of calves or adult whales with calves, but believed that a definition of what constitutes a calf should be provided.
In addition, the Commission took issue with the Service's statement suggesting that any strike quota established under the regulations could be revised periodically through notice-and-comment rulemaking.
The Commission expressed the view that formal rulemaking procedures needed to be followed, not only when establishing any such limitations, but when amending those limits as well.
The draft rule would have established a harvest season beginning on 1 July and ending on 31 July of each year.
The rationale given for the opening date was the need to defer hunting until the end of the calving season.
The Commission noted, however, that no rationale had been provided for the proposed closing date.
Development of a Proposed Rule After considering the Commission's comments and advice, the Service published a proposed rule on 4 October 2000.
At approximately the same time, the Service issued a draft environmental impact statement reviewing federal actions associated with the management and recovery of Cook Inlet beluga whales.
The preferred alternative identified in the statement was the issuance of regulations to establish an annual strike limit of two beluga whales until the Cook Inlet stock is no longer depleted.
This alternative was reflected in the proposed rule.
The Service believed that allowing two strikes per year would meet the dual objectives of providing an opportunity for a traditional subsistence harvest while not significantly delaying the recovery of 51 the stock.
The Service estimated that a take of two whales per year would enable the stock to recover to the lower bound of its optimum sustainable population range within 25 years, as compared with a recovery time of 22 years under a no-harvest scenario.
Despite the advice it had received from the Commission, the Service reiterated its view that the proposed strike limit could be adjusted periodically, if necessary, without undergoing formal rulemaking procedures.
As with the earlier draft, the proposed rule would defer several specifics of the harvest to be worked out through co-management agreements between the Service and Native hunters.
Other elements, however, were revised.
As recommended by the Commission, the proposed rule delineated the geographic range of the Cook Inlet beluga whale stock.
Under the proposed rule, the stock was defined as any beluga whale occurring in the Gulf of Alaska north of 58�N latitude.
The starting date for the hunting season was moved to 15 July, and a closing date was dropped.
The proposed prohibition on taking adult belugas with calves was expanded to clarify that the prohibition applied not only to those with newborn calves but also to those with older, yet still maternally dependent calves.
The prohibition on taking calves, however, apparently would apply only to newborn calves.
With respect to commercial activities, the Service proposed prohibiting the sale of any products or foodstuffs from Cook Inlet beluga whales.
The proposed rule also indicated that the formal hearing in this matter had been scheduled for 5 December 2000 and indicated that interested parties were required to file a notice of intent to participate by 1 November.
Preparations for a Formal Hearing On 1 November 2000 the Commission filed its notice of intent to participate as a party in the formal rulemaking hearing.
The Commission indicated that it intended to file direct testimony from one witness, who was an expert in environmental statistics and risk analysis modeling for endangered animal populations and a former member of the Commission's Committee of Scientific Advisors on Marine Mammals.
The Commission noted that its witness's testimony would address issues related to the population model being put forward by the Service, the population dynamics of the Cook Inlet stock of beluga whales, and the proposed harvest limits.
Comments and Commission positions MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 with respect to other issues related to the rulemaking were included in the 1 November letter.
Although reserving comment on the proposed two-strike annual quota, the Commission noted that the proposed rule and related materials were silent as to how the allowable strikes would be allocated to Native hunters, other than to provide that any such hunting would be authorized pursuant to a cooperative agreement between the Service and an Alaska Native organization.
Although from a purely biological perspective, it does not matter who is authorized to take beluga whales under the proposed strike limit, the Commission is not limited to considering biological impacts when formulating its recommendations.
Rather, the Marine Mammal Protection Act directs the Commission to recommend those measures it deems desirable to further "the protection of the Indians, Eskimos, and Aleuts whose livelihood may be adversely affected by actions taken pursuant to [the] Act."
In furtherance of this duty, the Commission stated that it was imperative that the Service develop a method for allocating the limited number of strikes that is fair to all hunters.
In the Commission's view, it was not sufficient merely to provide that strikes would be allocated to those Alaska Native organizations with which a cooperative agreement is negotiated.
Rather, the Service, as part of the rulemaking, needed to set forth the factors that it would use in making allocation decisions and solicit comment thereon.
As it had in its previous comments, the Commission again questioned whether section 101(b) of the Marine Mammal Protection Act provided flexibility for the Service periodically to review the effects of any harvest on the Cook Inlet beluga whale population and, as appropriate, adjust the number of allowable annual strikes through notice-and-comment rulemaking.
In the Commission's view, any regulation required to be adopted through formal rulemaking can only be amended using formal procedures.
Because of the difficulty and expense associated with periodic adjustments to a fixed harvest limit by formal rulemaking, the Commission stated its intent to promote consideration of more flexible regulatory alternatives.
The Commission also commented on the proposed prohibition on the sale of products from Cook Inlet beluga whales.
The Commission expressed the view 52 that this prohibition, although well intentioned, was too restrictive in some respects and not strict enough in others.
As discussed in the draft environ-mental impact statement, some Alaska Natives have used bone, teeth, and perhaps other parts of beluga whales to create traditional handicrafts.
In the Commission's opinion, there is no reason that the continued use of nonedible byproducts in the creation and sale of traditional Native handicrafts from beluga whales otherwise taken in accordance with the regu-lations should be proscribed.
The Commission also expressed concern that the proposed prohibition would only apply to one party in any transaction involving Cook Inlet beluga whales.
The Commission therefore recommended that the proposed rule be expanded to prohibit not only the sale of edible portions of Cook Inlet beluga whales, but the purchase of such items as well.
To facilitate enforcement, the Commission further recommended that the regulations also prohibit attempts to sell or purchase edible portions.
The Com-mission also identified a potential similarity-of-appearance problem that would warrant an expansion of the proposed prohibition on sales.
Inasmuch as some muktuk from beluga whales taken in areas other than Cook Inlet has apparently been sold in the Anchorage area, the Commission suggested that, unless there is a quick, easy, reliable, and cost-effective way of differentiating between edible portions from Cook Inlet beluga whales and those from other stocks, the Service needed to consider expanding the proposed prohibition to include sales of all edible portions of beluga whales within Anchorage or throughout the Cook Inlet area.
Over the past several years, the hunting efficiency for beluga whales in Cook Inlet has been quite low.
The Service, in its draft environmental impact statement, suggested that the ratio of landed to struckbut-lost whales may be one, or even two, whales lost for each one landed.
The Commission therefore encouraged the Service, as part of the rulemaking, to consider ways in which hunting efficiency might be increased.
Possible measures identified by the Commission included (1) requiring hunters to use har- Chapter III Species of Special Concern poons, that, according to the draft statement, aid in retrieval, but are not always used; (2) requiring hunters to tag struck whales to aid in relocation, should the animal be lost; and (3) placing restrictions on when and where beluga whales may be hunted so as to avoid areas of high turbidity, strong currents, or times of large tidal fluctuations that may contribute to failure to land a struck whale.
A second measure of harvest efficiency is the extent to which landed whales are fully used.
The draft statement noted that the type and quantity of edible portions retained from landed beluga whales vary depending on the customs and practices of the hunter.
Although believing that Native customs and traditional use patterns should be respected to the extent possible when promulgating the regulations, the Commission nevertheless thought that the Service should explore alternatives that would facilitate the sharing of edible portions of beluga whales not used in the harvesting village with residents of other villages.
The Commission also expressed support for the provision in the proposed rule that would prohibit hunting before 15 July as a means to minimize the possibility of taking pregnant females and the proposed prohibition on the taking of "newborn calves, or adult whales with older, maternally dependent calves."
With respect to the latter prohibition, however, the Commission indicated that there was a need for the Service to clarify whether the prohibition was intended to cover all maternally dependent calves, not just newborns.
This was the stated intent in the preamble, but it was not reflected in the proposed regulatory language itself.
The Commission also recommended that the Service provide additional guidance to hunters to allow them to differentiate between calves that legally may be taken and those that may not.
Commission Testimony As noted earlier, the Commission's witness filed direct testimony to be considered during the rulemaking hearing.
The testimony expressed the view that there were three primary problems with the harvest quota being proposed by the Service.
It noted that (1) there was appreciable uncertainty in the key variables forming the substantive basis of the proposed rule, (2) the analysis of the proposal in the draft environmental impact statement did not take sufficient account of that uncertainty, and (3) the proposed rule was not sufficiently precautionary in light of the uncertainty.
The Commission noted that, although there was a range of plausible values for each of the key variables (current and historic population sizes, harvest-related mortality, the lower bound of the optimum sustainable population range for beluga whales, and the stock's maximum growth rate), the Service had used point estimates in its population modeling.
In using fixed values for these uncertain parameters, the Service's calculations of the delay in time-to-recovery under different harvest scenarios could be under- or overestimates.
Thus, it was not apparent that the proposed harvest levels would meet the Service's stated goal of not delaying recovery time of the population to the lower bound of the optimum sustainable population range by greater than 10 percent.
As noted in the Commission's testimony, the preferred method for developing appropriate harvest limits would be a Monte Carlo analysis, a statistical tool for taking account of such uncertainty.
Such an analysis would represent the uncertain variables with probability distributions and compute the probability distribution of predicted outcomes.
Using this approach, decisionmakers could judge the proposed harvest levels relative to the probability of achieving an identified outcome (e.g., no more than a certain percentage delay in recovery time).
The testimony also noted that the proposal to allow no more than two strikes per year was a vast improvement over the unregulated harvest of the recent past.
Nevertheless, based on the Service's failure to consider uncertainty in its analysis, it concluded that there was an unacceptably high risk that the delay in recovery time for the stock would exceed the level identified by the Service as being acceptable.
In light of the very small size of the Cook Inlet beluga whale stock and its steep decline in abundance over the past several years, the testimony concluded that it would be prudent to adopt a rule that initially would be more protective than that proposed by the Service, and that harvest limitations should be relaxed only after additional data derived from continued monitoring of the population demonstrated that the population could withstand such taking.
The Formal Rulemaking Hearing The formal hearing required by the Marine Mammal Protection Act 53 MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 was held in Anchorage, Alaska, on 58 December 2000.
In addition to the National Marine Fisheries Service and the Marine Mammal Commission, the Village of Tyonek, the Cook Inlet Treaty Tribes, Trustees for Alaska (representing the Center for Marine Conservation), the Alaska Oil and Gas Association, and Joel and Debra Blatchford (repre-senting their interests as individual subsistence hunters) participated as parties.
The Municipality of Anchorage, Kenai Peninsula Borough, and Matanuska-Susitna Borough had initially indicated their intent to participate collectively in the hearing but later with-drew because their primary focus was on issues related to the possible listing of the Cook Inlet beluga whale stock under the Endangered Species Act rather than those related to subsistence hunting.
At the hearing, parties were provided the opportunity to present supplementary direct testimony, to cross-examine other parties' witnesses, and to offer rebuttal testimony.
The transcript of the hearing, along with written submissions, forms the record upon which the administrative law judge presiding at the hearing is to base a recommended decision.
The Commission's proposal for a harvest regime, driven by a likelihood of meeting specific recovery criteria that could be modified to reflect the observed growth of the population, was generally received favorably by the other parties.
The Commission believed that such a regime, although more conservative than the Service's proposal in the early years, might enable strike limits to be increased as the stock recovers.
Rather than relying on posthearing briefs to elucidate the positions of the parties, the judge encouraged the parties to work cooperatively to arrive at compromise solutions.
To the extent that accept-able compromises could be reached, the parties could agree to them through stipulations.
At the conclusion of the hearing the parties met to consider a more flexible harvest regime along the lines recommended by the Commission.
Recognizing that the data necessary to conclusively measure current populations trends would likely not be available for four to six years, the parties tentatively agreed to an interim quota of six beluga whales over the next four years.
It was also agreed that the Service would convene a meeting of agency and other scientists to design a longer-term, flexible management regime based on achieving a yet-to-be54 specified delay in recovery time criteria.
Although progress was made toward developing a proposal for the alternative regime, no final agreement was reached.
Pressure to complete the rulemaking in time to have regulations in place before the 2001 hunting season was eased by enactment of Public Law 106-553 on 21 December 2000.
Section 627 of that law reinstated on a permanent basis the prohibition on hunting Cook Inlet beluga whales unless authorized by a cooperative agreement between the National Marine Fisheries Service and an Alaska Native organization.
Despite enactment of this provision, the Service intends to complete the rulemaking as a more comprehensive approach that takes into account the views of diverse constituencies in establishing allowable harvest limits.
Hawaiian Monk Seal (Monachus schauinslandi ) The Hawaiian monk seal is the most endangered seal in U.S. waters.
The species is one of three in the genus Monachus.
The Caribbean monk seal is now considered extinct.
The Mediterranean monk seal probably numbers 300 to 500 animals and is on the verge of extinction.
The Hawaiian monk seal, numbering about 1,300 to 1,400 animals, also is in danger of extinction, but has a better chance of long-term survival.
Certain primitive features indicate that the Hawaiian monk seal may have evolved as long ago as 15 million years.
Where the species evolved is unknown, but currently these seals are found only in the Hawaiian archipelago (Fig. 4).
Within the archipelago, monk seals apparently were extirpated from the main Hawaiian Islands soon after the arrival of the first human settlers 2,000 years ago.
Thus, their presentday distribution is confined largely to the remote Northwestern Hawaiian Islands, a chain of small islands and atolls stretching more than 2,000 km to the northwest of the main Hawaiian Islands.
Even at these remote locations, monk seals have been subjected to a variety of natural and human-related impacts that have contributed to their current endangered state.
In the 1800s they were killed by sealers, explorers, and ship- Chapter III Species of Special Concern N S Figure 4.
The Hawaiian Archipelago.
The Northwestern Hawaiian Islands provide pupping beaches for all major breeding colonies of Hawaiian monk seals.
wrecked sailors for skins, oil, and food.
In the 1900s they suffered more from disturbance and loss of habitat due to an increasing human presence.
Historical records of early expeditions to the Northwestern Hawaiian Islands indicate that by 1900 Hawaiian monk seals may have been extirpated at two or possibly three sites (Laysan Island, Midway Atoll, and French Frigate Shoals) in the chain.
Some recovery must have occurred by the 1950s although abundance and trends before that time are poorly known.
The first range-wide count was conducted in the 1950s, well after the species' distribution had been reduced to its current range.
The count provided an index of total population size rather than a population estimate, because it did not include seals at sea during the count.
Generally, about one-third of the seals are on land during a typical count.
By the 1970s the abundance of Hawaiian monk seals had declined considerably (Fig. 55 5) and in 1976 the species was listed as endangered under the Endangered Species Act.
Subsequent counts indicate that the total population declined by about 60 percent from the mid-1950s to the early 1990s, but has remained at about the same low level since (Fig. 5).
The decline appears to have leveled off in the 1990s.
During the past four decades the six existing colonies have exhibited varying demographic trends.
Numbers declined at Kure Atoll, Midway Atoll, Pearl and Hermes Reef, Lisianski Island, and Laysan Island.
In contrast, the colony at French Frigate Shoals grew perhaps as much as four- to sixfold during this period, and by the mid-1980s approximately half of the total population occurred at that site.
Since the late 1980s, however, this colony has declined sharply in numbers, and it is expected to continue declining in the near future due to a lack of recruitment of young animals into the breeding age groups (described later).
MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 56 MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 Site-Specific Status and Trends A review of the status and trends of the existing colonies is necessary to understand the past decline of the Hawaiian monk seal and the challenge of promoting recovery of the species in the future.
French Frigate Shoals Based on its abundance, the colony of Hawaiian monk seals at French Frigate Shoals has dominated trends for the species over the past several decades.
The oscillation in abundance at this site (Fig. 6) is likely due to a combination of factors.
The growth observed from the late 1950s to the 1980s probably occurred as a result of decreased human disturbance at French Frigate Shoals.
Military operations in the late 1930s and 1940s must have had a considerable effect on the local seal colony, both through disturbance and the loss of seal haul-out areas to human activities, and possibly through the incidental injury or killing of seals.
Since the late 1950s human activities have been reduced considerably, which has lessened the impact on the seals and allowed a period of local growth and recovery.
By the mid- to late 1980s, however, the number of seals at this atoll may have reached the environmental carrying capacity.
Since the late 1980s the French Frigate Shoals colony has declined by 60 percent or more due to poor survival of pups and juveniles, slow growth and maturation of survivors, and low reproductive success of mature females.
Important known sources of juvenile mortality include food limitation or starvation, shark predation, and adult male aggression.
Slow growth and maturation, as well as low reproductive success, are also consistent with food limitation.
Thus, the existing evidence suggests that the growing colony of seals may have reached the environmental carrying capacity by depleting food resources at the atoll and nearby banks where they feed.
At the same time, however, the environmental carrying capacity itself may have declined.
Climate studies indicate the occurrence of decadal-scale shifts in North Pacific oceanographic and atmospheric conditions, which may have decreased productivity in the 1980s and 1990s and, subsequently, reduced prey availability for higher-level predators such as the Hawaiian monk seal.
In effect, the demands of a growing colony may have overshot a waning food supply, exacerbating the demographic problems described earlier.
This scenario may have been further complicated in the late 1970s and 1980s by development of the Northwestern Hawaiian Islands lobster fishery.
The fishery took its largest catches in the early 1980s and focused its effort at banks within the foraging range of monk seals from French Frigate Shoals.
The fishery reduced considerably the standing biomass of lobster and may well have seriously reduced the available biomass of octopus, Annual total of mean counts by site 1000 800 600 400 200 0 1955 1965 1975 1985 1995 2005 Year Mean beach count # 500 400 300 200 100 0 1970 1980 Year 1990 150 125 100 75 50 25 0 2000 Figure 5.
Combined annual mean beach counts for all major Hawaiian monk seal breeding colonies, 19582000.
Figure 6.
Annual mean beach counts (filled squares) and pups born (open circles) at French Frigate Shoals.
56 Number born Chapter III Species of Special Concern which is taken as bycatch.
Both lobster and octopus are known prey of Hawaiian monk seals, and the fishery may thereby have contributed to the seals' nutritional limitation.
Finally, the decline of this colony also has been exacerbated by shark predation and adult male aggression.
Sharks are known to attack monk seals of all sizes and are a particular threat to pups and juveniles.
In recent years tiger and Gal�pagos sharks have frequented the nearshore waters off several main pupping islets at French Frigate Shoals.
These sharks are known to have killed some pups and are suspected to have killed others.
In 1999 a total of 92 pups was born, of which 25 are believed to have died from shark predation.
Aggressive adult males also have contributed to pup mortality at this site.
In 1991 and in 1998 adult males were removed from this colony after they were observed harassing and, in some cases, killing pups.
All of these factors together have not only reduced the French Frigate Shoals colony by more than 60 percent over the last decade but have also destabilized its age structure.
Due to extremely low survival of pups and juveniles, few young females have reached maturity at this site in recent years and few are expected to do so in the next 5 to 10 years.
Thus, the reproductive potential of the colony has been diminished considerably.
In 2000 the number of births recorded dropped to 67, approximately half the annual number in the mid-1980s.
The number of seals will probably continue to decline in the near future.
The National Marine Fisheries Service has conducted extensive research at the site.
With the assistance of Sea Life Park, the Fish and Wildlife Service, the Coast Guard, and the Navy, the Service also carried out several captive care and relocation programs in an effort to salvage the reproductive potential being lost.
These programs were intended to return emaciated pups and juveniles to good health and condition, protect them from sharks and aggressive adult males, and (in the majority of cases) relocate them to areas where availability of prey would be adequate to support normal growth, maturation, and reproduction.
A number of pups were relocated to Kure Atoll and successfully bolstered recovery of that colony.
In the early 1990s 57 relocation efforts were redirected to Midway Atoll, but after several unsuccessful efforts at that site, the release site for young animals in captive care was changed back to Kure Atoll.
In 1995, however, 12 pups taken from French Frigate Shoals contracted an eye disease that precluded their release.
Although these seals have since been transferred to another captive facility, this ailment and, more generally, the potential for disease transmission between colonies have emphasized the need for caution in future relocation efforts.
As discussed below, the variability of juvenile survival as observed at this site and earlier at Kure Atoll and the need to prevent the loss of the species' reproductive potential will likely be important considerations for monk seal research and recovery efforts for some time to come.
Laysan Island By the late 1800s the Hawaiian monk seal colony on Laysan Island was virtually, if not totally, extirpated.
Few seals were seen on the island, probably because they had been killed for food or disturbed by feather collectors and guano miners.
Schauinsland, the scientist who initially described the species, failed to see a single living seal during a three-month visit to the island in 1896.
Other visitors recorded a similar absence of seals.
However, the colony must have recovered to some degree by the 1950s and 1960s, when counts revealed between 200 and 300 seals on the beach.
Thereafter, the counts declined erratically to a low point in 1990.
Since 1990 the colony has shown a slow increase in both the mean annual count and the number of pups born (Fig. 7).
In 1978 the decline of the Laysan Island population was accelerated by a die-off of at least 50 seals.
Poisoning by ciguatoxin (a naturally occurring biotoxin) was suspected, but the cause remains unknown.
The remainder of the decline also has not been explained.
Military activities took place on Laysan Island during the period of decline, but the nature of those activities and their potential effect on monk seals have not been described.
Research activities conducted since the late 1970s suggest that at least the later part of the decline might have been due to increased mortality of adult females and juveniles by mobbing or male aggression.
The term "mobbing" is used to describe incidents where multiple males attempt to mount and mate with a MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 single female (or in some cases a juvenile animal of either sex) at the same time.
During mating, which occurs in the water, a male bites the female's back to help him attain and maintain his position.
When repeated by multiple males, such bites can cause severe and even lethal wounds.
Evidence of mobbing has been observed at several sites but has been best studied at Laysan Island.
Between 1984 and 1992 mobbing was a factor in 45 of the 63 monk seal deaths (70 percent) confirmed at this site.
Mobbing is thought to result, at least in part, from an imbalance in the adult sex ratio.
Data from the late 1970s and early 1980s suggest that the adult sex ratio in the colony was heavily skewed with as many as 2.5 to 3 males for each female.
In effect, the "functional" sex ratio may have been even more extreme.
During the species' prolonged reproductive season, females with pups are antagonistic to adult males and are generally unavailable for mating.
Estrus for the remaining females is relatively asynchronous (although estrus is not always a factor in mobbing), and the result is a functionally skewed sex ratio with multiple males vying for the mating rights with relatively few available females.
To the extent that mobbing increases female mortality, it also creates a feedback loop: a skewed sex ratio increases the likelihood of mobbing, and mobbingrelated mortality further reduces the number of females, further skewing the sex ratio.
Studies conducted at Laysan Island since the early 1980s indicate, however, that the sex ratio of adult animals has been steadily changing from one skewed toward males to one approaching parity or slightly biased toward adult females.
In 1984 nine adult males were relocated from Laysan Island to Johnston Atoll and in 1994 a total of 22 males was relocated to the main Hawaiian Islands to facilitate this transition and reduce the incidence of male aggression.
None of the males returned to Laysan Island, and data collected after the 1994 relocation revealed a significant reduction in injuries and mortality resulting from such aggression.
In 1999 and 2000 the adult sex ratio was 0.9:1.0 (M:F).
Nevertheless, in 1999 mobbing or single-male aggression resulted in five injuries and two deaths, indicating that such aggression still may occur with lethal consequences.
In 2000 only a 58 300 250 200 150 100 50 0 1970 1980 Year 1990 60 50 40 30 20 10 0 2000 Mean beach count # Figure 7.
Annual mean beach counts (filled squares) and pups born (open circles) at Laysan Island.
single nonlethal injury was attributed to male aggression.
The recovery team has recommended that individuals males exhibiting excessively aggressive behavior be removed from Laysan and Lisianski Island (described later), as was done at Laysan Island in 1994 and at French Frigate Shoals in 1991 and 1998.
At present the Laysan colony seems poised for continued recovery.
The number of pups born annually (Fig. 7) has increased, albeit variably, over the past decade.
A total of 58 pups was born at Laysan Island in 1999, the largest number of births recorded since intensive monitoring began in the late 1970s.
In 2000 the number of pups born was 43.
Unfortunately, the increase in number of pups born in 1999 was offset somewhat by a decrease in pup and juvenile survival.
Due to its small size, recovery of this colony will likely occur slowly.
However, in the absence of excessive mortality due to mobbing and male aggression, recovery can reasonably be expected to continue in the near future.
Lisianski Island From the late 1950s to the 1980s the monk seal colony at Lisianski Island exhibited a decline similar to that observed at Laysan Island.
In contrast to the colony at Laysan Island, counts at Lisianski Island have continued to decline slowly (Fig. 8).
The number of pups born has increased slowly since 1991, but juvenile mortality has increased.
At least two problems are known to Number born, Chapter III Species of Special Concern Mean beach count # 30 20 10 0 1980 Year 1990 2000 30 20 10 1980 Year 1990 0 2000 90 60 30 0 1970 Figure 8.
Annual mean beach counts (filled squares) and pups born (open circles) at Lisianski Island.
Figure 9.
Annual mean beach counts (filled squares) and pups born (open circles) at Pearl and Hermes Reef.
be impeding recovery at the site: male aggression and entanglement in marine debris.
In the late 1970s and early 1980s the colony at Lisianski may have contained as many as three adult males per adult female.
This imbalance has been correcting itself over the past two decades, but has not yet reached parity.
In 2000 the adult sex ratio was 1.6:1.0 (M:F).
The imbalance is observed in the older adults (
Still, in 1999 a total of 10 observed injuries was attributed to single-male aggression or mobbing, indicating that male aggression may impede the colony's recovery.
In 2000 this number declined to 4.
Because studies at Lisianski Island have not been as consistent as those at Laysan Island, the significance of male aggression at this site is less well known.
Entanglement in marine debris is a serious problem at all sites, but has been particularly serious at Lisianski Island.
Historically, researchers have found greater deposition of debris and more entanglement of seals at Lisianski Island than at any other site in the Northwestern Hawaiian Islands.
In 1999 seven seals were observed entangled at this site; three escaped independently and four were released by the researchers.
In contrast to past trends, no entangled seals were observed as this site in 2000.
An unknown number of entangled seals are unable to return to the island where they might be observed and freed.
In 1999 a cooperative effort removed debris from three sites, including Lisianski Island, to reduce the damage done to coral reefs and the threat to wildlife, including monk seals (see later in this section and Chapter VII).
The continued removal of debris from this site, as well as other sites in the chain, remains a high priority.
Because both entanglement and male aggression may contribute significantly to increased mortality at this site, recovery of this colony will remain uncertain until the incidence of both is understood and management actions have been taken to mitigate the impacts.
Pearl and Hermes Reef The colony of Hawaiian monk seals at Pearl and Hermes Reef declined from the late 1950s to the mid-1970s, but has been recovering gradually since then (Fig. 9).
In the 1950s the local abundance of seals was probably depleted by military excursions from Midway Atoll.
Such activities no longer occur and this colony is now largely free from human disturbance.
Male aggression and mobbing appear to be rare at Pearl and Hermes Reef, survival rates of young animals appear to be good, and the age structure is stable and poised for further growth in the future (i.e., the colony has a high proportion of young animals that are reaching maturity and beginning to contribute to 59 Number born, 120 Mean beach count # 150 40 Number born# 150 125 100 75 50 25 0 1970 40 MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 the productivity of the colony).
Monk seals tagged at Pearl and Hermes Reef are frequently sighted at Midway and Kure Atolls, and appear to contribute to the growth of those colonies, particularly at Midway Atoll.
In the recent past, recovery at these three western sites has partially offset the decline at French Frigate Shoals.
In October 1999 this atoll was partially cleared of debris by the cooperative effort mentioned earlier.
Nevertheless, entanglement in marine debris continues to be a threat to recovery of this colony.
In 2000 two entangled seals were observed and successfully disentangled by field personnel.
In June 2000 the longline fishing vessel Swordman I ran aground near Pearl and Hermes Reef, spilling an estimated 2,200 gallons of diesel fuel.
It also had additional fuel and oil on board, holds full of eventually rotting fish and bait, and large amounts of line and fishing gear that could have been lost to the sea if not cleaned up.
Researchers from the monk seal program were conducting studies at Pearl and Hermes Reef and rescued crew members from the Swordman I.
A natural resource assessment crew from the Fish and Wildlife was on the scene one we
